<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001215</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, today we consider legislation that addresses crucial areas of our Nation's tax and health care policy. I applaud the hard work of appropriators and President Clinton in coming to a hard-won agreement on this year's final spending bill. And, I am pleased that we can finally wrap up the business of the 106th Congress and clear the deck for our new President and the 107th Congress. 
   This bill includes many of my legislative priorities, which I believe will benefit Rhode Islanders, and all Americans. 
   First: let's focus on those in the area of health care. The health care portion of this measure includes two legislative proposals I authored, and for which I worked hard to build bipartisan support this year: a version of the State Children's Health Insurance Program Preservation Act, and the Medicaid Disproportionate Share Hospital Preservation Act. 
   The SCHIP provision allows 40 states--including Rhode Island--to retain for two more years $1.2 billion in children's health insurance funds. In extending the deadline for states to spend these federal dollars, we give eligible children in 40 states the opportunity to receive health insurance. In Rhode Island, our state's low-income health care program--known as RIte Care--may be able to retain as much a $8 million in federal funds. That amount would go a long way to cover uninsured children between the ages of eight and 18 in my home state. 
   My second priority--The Medicaid Disproportionate Share Hospital Preservation Act--would benefit hospitals that serve a disproportionate share of America's 43 million uninsured. It would increase Medicaid DSH payments to these hospitals to defray their costs of treating Medicaid patients--particularly indigent patients with complex medical needs. In all, it would strengthen the safety net for Rhode Island's hospitals--that are struggling as a result of the budget cuts instituted by the Balanced Budget Act of 1997. Indeed, this proposal could save Rhode Island hospitals $10 million over the next two years. 
   What's more, the initiative before us increases Medicare reimbursements for teaching hospitals, and scales back deep cuts to the home health care industry. And, it bolsters the ability of nursing homes and community health clinics to provide high quality service to those in need. Together, these provisions will go a long way to improve the health care received by the children, the elderly, and the uninsured of our nation. 
   Turning to the tax provisions, I am heartened that this bill contains many incentives to rebuild distressed communities, both in urban and rural areas. I've cosponsored legislation to foster urban renewal, and I am pleased that this package contains a version of  it. Specifically, this measure would establish 40 renewal communities and designate 9 new empowerment zones that would be eligible for tax breaks. 
   I am particularly heartened that this measure increases the low-income housing tax credit caps over the next two years. Along with the Rhode Island Housing Authority, I am an ardent supporter of this increase because it will help many low-income families gain access to affordable housing. 
   What's more, the initiative we consider today accelerates a scheduled increase in the state volume limits on tax-exempt private activity bonds. This provision has broad, bipartisan support, and I am glad we are moving forward with it. 
   Finally, many of you know that, as a member of the Environment and Public Works Committee, I have worked to win passage of legislation to spur cleanup of lightly contaminated industrial sites--so-called brownfields sites. This bill contains a brownfields expensing provision that promotes the clean-up of environmental contaminants. This is a modest step in the direction of the wholesale reform I've been pressing, but it is an important step towards that eventual goal. 
   I am pleased that we have finally reached agreement with our counterparts on the other side of the aisle here in the Senate; with our colleagues in the House of Representatives; and most importantly, with the Clinton administration on this broad spending package. 
   In that spirit of constructive compromise, I will vote in favor of this bill. I urge my colleagues to do the same. I thank the Chair. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001215</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I would like to clarify the intent of the conferees regarding a provision in the conference report accompanying H.R. 4576, FY01 Defense appropriations bill (H. Rept. 106-754). Within this legislation is $2 million for the expansion of a successful Executive MBA program, jointly administered by the Naval Undersea Warfare Center (NUWC), Newport, Rhode Island and Bryant College, Smithfield, Rhode Island. The funding  will be used to expand the current student enrollment from 30 to 60 Navy personnel and to expand and upgrade Bryant's technical capabilities. Specifically, funds will be used to expand and upgrade Bryant's network bandwidth to gigabit speed, as well as fund technological enhancements to Bryant's new Bello Center for Information and Technology, allowing Executive MBA students better access to valuable information resources. This, in turn, will assist them in their studies at Bryant. The $2 million for the expansion of this program will not only allow 30 more military/government personnel to earn an MBA at Bryant, but will link those students with expanded technical resources at Bryant. This linkage will allow Executive MBA students access to all information available within Bryant's resources and create the capability to interact with each other and with other students on and off campus. 
   Is this description what the conferees intend? </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001215</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, it is with great pleasure that I today pay tribute to the accomplishments of the Girl Scouts and Boy Scouts of Rhode Island. These fine organizations include an admirable group of young men and women who have distinguished themselves as leaders in their communities. 
   Since the beginning of this century, the Girls Scouts and Boy Scouts of America have provided thousands of youngsters each year with the opportunity to make friends, explore new ideas, and develop leadership skills, along with a sense of determination, self-reliance, and teamwork. 
   These awards are presented only to those who possess the qualities that make our nation great: commitment to excellence, hard work, and genuine love for community service. The Silver and Gold Awards represent the highest awards attainable by junior and high school Girl Scouts. Becoming an Eagle Scout is an extraordinary award with which only the finest Boy Scouts are honored. To earn the award--the highest advancement rank in Scouting--a Boy Scout must demonstrate proficiency in the rigorous areas of leadership, service, and outdoor skills. 
   I ask my colleagues to join me in congratulating the recipients of these awards. Their activities are indeed worthy of praise. Their leadership benefits our community and they serve as role models for their peers. 
   Also, we must not forget the unsung heroes, who continue to devote a large part of their lives to make all this possible. Therefore, I salute the families, Scout leaders and countless others who have given generously of their time and energy in support of Scouting. 
   It is with great pride that I submit a list of the young men and women of Rhode Island who have earned this award. 
   Mr. President, I ask that the list be printed the RECORD. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001024</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, today I rise to thank the chairman of the Senate Appropriations Subcommittee on Treasury and General Government, Senator CAMPBELL, for including funds for the National Historical Publications and Records Commission to provide a grant to the Heritage Harbor Museum in Providence for the development of the museum's Native American Story exhibit.  
   The funds will be used by the Museum and the local Native American community to research and catalog the history of the area's Native Americans in a cross-cultural context. As the chairman knows, Heritage Harbor revolves around the telling of our nation's history in an integrated environment. The museum will not focus on one ethnic or religious group but strive to present the independent and coexisting histories of many of our nation's peoples. 
   The task ahead for Heritage Harbor is a complex one, and I appreciate the committee underscoring the federal interest in the project by providing these funds. In order for the Native American perspective to be presented effectively, the museum will not only research records, data and artifacts, but it will also catalog the research and present it in formal exhibit fashion. 
   Is it the understanding of the Chairman that these funds are intended to be used for research and cataloging as well as exhibit presentation? </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-2-20001024</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Again, I thank the Senator for his interest in this project, and I look forward to inviting you to Rhode Island to see the results of the museum's effort. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001023</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today in support of the conference report to S. 835, the Estuaries and Clean Waters Act of 2000. 
   During my year in the Senate, one of my top legislative priorities has been the enactment of my father's estuary habitat restoration partnership legislation, S. 835. This bill will promote the restoration of one million acres of estuary habitat by directing $275 million in funding and other incentives to local estuarine restoration projects. 
   I congratulate the Members of the Senate Environment and Public Works Committees, and in particular Chairman BOB SMITH, for their expertise, persistence and enthusiastic support for this important environmental bill. And, I am delighted that the Senate is approving this compromise version, and moving the Estuaries and Clean Waters Act one step closer to enactment this session. 
   Mr. President, my father was a champion of efforts to protect wetlands and estuarine areas, and he felt strongly that the federal government should do more to restore and safeguard these valuable habitats. He had a special devotion and appreciation for the salt marshes, coves and coastline of Narragansett Bay. Thus, in the fall of 1997, at Edgewood Yacht Club in Cranston, surrounded by supporters from Rhode Island's Save The Bay, Senator John H. Chafee announced introduction of his comprehensive legislation to protect and restore our nation's estuaries. That bill evolved into S. 835, the Estuary Habitat Restoration Partnership Act that he introduced in the Spring of last year. And, when we approve this legislation, we are carrying out the work that my father considered to be of utmost importance to the health of our fisheries, the quality of our waters, and the beauty of our great land. 
   Estuaries are where the river's current meets the sea's tide. These waterbodies are unique areas where life thrives. They are where the food chain begins, and many estuaries produce more harvestable human food per acre than the best mid-western farmland. An astonishing variety of life, including animals as diverse as lobsters, Whooping Cranes, manatees, salmon, otters, Bald Eagles, and sea turtles, all depend on estuaries for their survival. Estuaries provide the nursing grounds for our fisheries, support many of our endangered and threatened species and host nearly half of the neotropical migratory birds in the United States. 
   However, these productive areas are fragile, and vulnerable to human and environmental pressures. Today, burgeoning human populations in coastal areas are disrupting the balance and threatening the health of fragile estuary habitats. Activities such as dredging, draining, the construction of dams, uncontrolled sewage discharges, and other forms of pollution have all led to the degradation and destruction of estuary habitat. The bottom line is that we are not doing enough for these valuable resources. Estuaries are national treasures, and they deserve a national effort to protect and restore them. 
   Like the many supporters of S. 835, I believe estuary legislation is needed to turn the tide and start restoring the valuable estuarine habitats that are literally disappearing along our nation's coasts. Senator John H. Chafee used to say: ``Given half a chance, nature will rebound and overcome tremendous setbacks, but we must--at the very least--give it that half a chance.'' The good news is that in many degraded coastal areas, nature will rebound if we simply reduce pollution, or return salt water, or replant eelgrass in the proper conditions. 
   This legislation will fuel efforts to restore one million acres of estuary habitat by emphasizing several aspects of successful habitat restoration projects: effective coordination among different levels of government; continued investment by public and private sector partners; and, most importantly, active participation by local communities. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001019</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today to congratulate Paul Arpin Van Lines Inc., a moving company based in West Warwick, Rhode Island, on its 100th anniversary. 
   The business community of the State of Rhode Island is comprised primarily of small, family businesses. Indeed, 98 percent of Rhode Island businesses are small businesses. These businesses have played an extremely important role in the growth and strength of the Rhode Island economy. One of these businesses is a moving company, Paul Arpin Van Lines Inc., of West Warwick, Rhode Island. 
   One hundred years ago this month, the company was founded by Paul G. Arpin, who left it to his son, Paul Arpin. Paul Arpin is still very active in the daily affairs of the business as Chief Financial Officer. Paul's son, David, is now the company's President. 
   Paul Arpin Van Lines Inc., has grown considerably since its founding. It now employs 400 Rhode Islanders and has 160 agents throughout the country. It has survived the Great Depression, a number of recessions and various other financial downturns that challenged far larger businesses in the state. Its sound business practices and active community involvement through the years have been a constant source of pride, not only to the Arpin family, but to many generations of Rhode Island families employed by them. 
   It is with great pleasure that I salute the entire Arpin family for its many accomplishments over this past century and wish them many, many more years of success.  </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001018</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. While the language in this conference report places a limitation on assistance by NRCS for activities related to the American Heritage Rivers, it should not be intended to penalize or disadvantage communities that seek or apply for grants and technical assistance. There is no specific limitation in this conference report that would preclude the NRCS from undertaking other authorized activities that are similar to those provided under the American Heritage Rivers Initiative. Would the Chairman and the Ranking Member agree with this interpretation? </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001012</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I appreciate the work of the subcommittee chairman and ranking minority Member in putting together this year's VA-HUD appropriations bill. I would like to clarify one matter of importance regarding removing an environmental threat in a Rhode Island community. The Centredale Manor Restoration Project is a Superfund site in North Providence, RI. With my encouragement, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has been moving quickly at this site. The site was only added to the National Priorities List in February of this year and several removal actions have been conducted at the site. Recently, the EPA released a proposed Engineering Evaluation/Cost Analysis that recommends replacement of the Allendale Dam and excavation of contaminated soils from residential properties along the Woonasquatucket River. These clean-up plans--requiring excavation of approximately 2,500 cubic yards of soils and sediments--were intended to be finalized later this year after the current public comment period, with design and construction work to follow shortly thereafter. There is a great deal of local support for getting on with this clean up and removing dangerous contaminants from North Providence neighborhoods. 
   I understand that the report attached to this bill contains language directing EPA to wait until completion of the current National Academy of Sciences study of sediment remediation technology, and proper consideration of the NAS study as it relates to EPA remedy selection, before finalizing any more dredging plans. The NAS study is scheduled to be completed no later than January 1, 2001. It seems to me this report language would allow the EPA to continue planning associated with the Centredale Manor cleanup, including replacement of Allendale dam and excavation of contaminated soils and sediments in and along the Woonasquatucket River, at the North Providence Superfund site. Ultimately, I believe that following consideration of the NAS study, EPA will be able to finalize the cleanup plan and implement that final plan during the 2001 construction season. I would like to confirm with the Chairman of the VA-HUD Appropriations Subcommittee that the report language is not intended to delay progress toward cleaning up contamination at the Centredale Manor Restoration Project in North Providence. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-2-20001012</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I appreciate the chairman's clarification of this matter. 
   TEA-21</TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001012</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today to express my support for H.R. 1102, the Comprehensive Retirement Security and Pension Reform Act. 
   In my short time in the Senate, I have supported pension and savings reform and expansion, including cosponsoring S. 741, the Pension Coverage and Portability Act, and voting in favor of a pension and savings amendment offered by Finance Committee Chairman ROTH during consideration of H.R. 8, the estate tax phase out bill. I strongly believe that enacting H.R. 1102 will benefit millions of Americans, help boost America's savings rate, and bolster long-term economic growth. Indeed, economists agree that the increased personal savings and investment that would result from expanding pensions hold the key to long-term economic growth, and would shore up the country's savings tendencies. 
   Currently, only half of all workers have a pension plan. That means about 75 million Americans don't have access to one of the key components to a comfortable retirement. Pension laws have become so convoluted and the annual contribution limit so diminished that many small businesses simply do not bother setting them up. 
   In fact, the contribution limits to Individual Retirement Accounts (IRAs) have not changed since 1981. At that time, when the $2,000 limit was set, according to the U.S. Census Bureau the U.S. means the U.S. mean household income was under $23,000. In 1998, mean household income was almost $52,000, an increase of more than 130 percent. Still, the maximum IRA contribution hasn't budged from $2,000. 
   Setting aside $5,000, rather than $2,000, will provide the retiree with significant additional savings. For workers who don't have access to an employer-sponsored retirement plan, the IRA is their primary savings vehicle. Increasing the contribution to $5,000 helps put these people on a more equal footing with their fellow citizens covered by employer-sponsored plans. Also, it is estimated that more than 61 percent of IRA participants with incomes under $50,000 contribute the $2,000 maximum; and 69 percent of all IRA participants contribute the maximum. Workers are ready to invest more--if we in Congress will open the door for them. 
   H.R. 1102 includes an income tax credit to help those who might not be able to fund their retirement accounts without additional help, or who need more incentive to save. Under this legislation, joint filers of tax returns earning under $50,000, heads of households earning under $37,500, and all other taxpayers earning less than $25,000 will receive non-refundable tax credits for each of five years on a sliding scale from five to 50 percent for contributions to a broad range of existing retirement savings choices. In effect, the federal government will be matching these savers contributions dollar for dollar--through the tax credit--up to the maximum allowable based on their income and filing status. 
   Another provision will help workers approaching retirement age to jump start, or catch up with, their retirement savings. Many of our younger workers are limited in what they can invest toward retirement due to the other priorities such as saving for a house, starting a family, or setting aside funds for their children's education. With retirement beginning to loom as they turn 50, the current limits on contributions both to their IRAs and to their employer-sponsored retirement plans make catching up extremely difficult. H.R. 1102 allows taxpayers 50 and older to contribute $7,500 annually to an IRA, or $5,000 to their employees' retirement plan when fully phased in. 
   Today, it is commonplace for workers to switch jobs frequently. But, under current regulations, these workers often cannot carry the retirement benefits they have accumulated with one employer to a new job. Provisions in H.R. 1102 remove the final obstacles to full retirement portability, meaning that a worker easily can take his or her accumulated benefits to a new job. This component of the legislation is particularly important to state and local government employees who currently cannot roll over their qualified retirement savings to a new employer when they move to private sector jobs. 
   In Rhode Island, small businesses are the heart of the economy. Indeed, 98 percent of Rhode Island businesses are small. And, they are important forces in developing two emerging segments of the state's economy: service and technology. H.R. 1102 also will remove disincentives which currently prevent many small business owners from offering retirement plans to their employees. In addition, it will make it easier  for long-serving union members to collect the full pension benefits they have earned. 
   Some provisions in the bill have stirred debate. One relates to cash balance pension plans. I recognize and appreciate the hard work that the Senate Finance Committee has done with respect to this issue, and understand that negotiations are still under way. I hope that the final product of these negotiations will help workers that are negatively affected by cash balance pension plan conversions. 
   The House approved H.R. 1102 by a vote of 401-25 on July 19th. I hope that we in the Senate act soon to approve this bill and send it to the President so that millions of hard working Americans will accrue its benefits. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001012</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, next month a remarkable woman, who is a constituent of mine, will celebrate her ninetieth birthday; although, if you ask her, she will tell you that she still feels like a sixteen year-old. 
   Alice B. Dwyer--known to family and close friends as ``Lally'' and to literally thousands of Rhode Islanders, who learned in her classroom, as ``Miss Dwyer''--was born on November 12, 1910. She was the second of four children of Matthew S. Dwyer and Alice Barry Dwyer of Providence. Her older sister, Matt, suffered from crippling polio at a time long before public accommodations for people with disabilities. Nevertheless, they set off together for Manhattanville College in New York City. 
   Alice Dwyer shies way from any words of recognition for her part in enabling her older sister, who had an insatiable lust for learning, to attend college. Alice simply was doing what has always come most naturally to her, giving to others. 
   After college, Alice went on to receive a Masters Degree in English Literature from Brown University, my own alma mater. With degrees in hand she began a lifetime of service to children in the Providence Public School system. The majority of her years teaching were spent at Classical High School where she taught sophomore English. 
   Today's public opinion polls tell us that education is the number one issue on the minds of Americans. We hear and talk a lot about holding students to high academic standards. But Alice Dwyer never needed pollsters and politicians to tell her about the importance of high standards. The students who read Shakespeare in her classroom knew that she expected each of them to do his or her best. 
   In addition to her love of teaching, Alice always has been an avid admirer of acting. She was among the Rhode Islanders to answer the casting call for ``The Great Gatsby,'' starring Robert Redford and Mia Farrow. At sunset each evening for weeks, she would cross the bridge to Newport, where she would don a glittering 1920s flapper gown and join the guests at Hollywood's most recent rendition of Jay Gatsby's famed summer parties. 
   After retiring from the Providence Public School system, Alice took on various volunteer activities. She read to children and worked in the library of the Fox Point Elementary School in Providence, and she was a regular in the phone bank on New London Avenue in Cranston, making calls to turn out the vote for my father's 1982 Senate campaign. She worked relentlessly on the two unsuccessful campaigns of Fred Lippitt to be mayor of Providence. 
   In 1994 when my father ran for his fourth Senate term, difficulty walking kept Alice away from campaign headquarters. However, as a woman who cannot do enough for others, she found a way to help. Campaign workers would drop off box loads of envelopes and lists of names and addresses with her. When one box was done, it would be picked up and another delivered in its place. 
   Combining her love of reading with her natural tendency to help others, Alice spent a great deal of time taping textbooks for blind and visually impaired students. 
   Whether it's the young person working at the Newport Creamery on Wayland Square where Alice is known for liking her coffee piping hot, or the students (now middle-aged men and women) who recall the lessons they learned from her at Classical High School, or her own family members, all agree that Alice Dwyer has filled their lives with her own giving spirit. 
   Alice Dwyer will celebrate her ninetieth year with her sister, Rita Scotti, with her eleven nieces and nephews and their families, and with dozens of friends and neighbors. It is my great privilege to wish this woman, who has warmed so many hearts with her unfailing kindness and generosity, a very Happy Birthday.  </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001011</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, when the Senate passed the Water Resources Development Act of 2000 (WRDA) on September 25th, a landmark piece of legislation was attached to the bill. This legislation--S. 2797, Restoring the Everglades, an American Legacy Act--was introduced by Senators SMITH, BAUCUS, VOINOVICH, GRAHAM and MACK earlier this summer to restore the natural ecosystem of the Florida Everglades. 
   Historically, the Florida Everglades system consisted of a natural flow of 1.7 billion gallons of fresh water draining into the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean on a daily basis. Beginning in 1948, the system has been adversely impacted by a series of Federal flood control projects authorized by Congress to redirect water flows throughout the Everglades. Over a half-century of Army Corps of Engineers' water infrastructure projects, consisting of a series of levees and canals, have severely damaged the Everglades system. This substantial diversion of water resulting from the infrastructure construction, coupled with increased development in the area, threaten the overall environmental health and sustainability of the Everglades National Park. In 1992 and 1996, Congress directed the Army Corps of Engineers to conduct a ``Restudy'' of the existing system and recommend changes to improve the current state of the Everglades. The results of the restudy and recommendations for restoring the system are incorporated into the ``Comprehensive Everglades Restoration Plan''. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001006</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, last week the Canadian people learned of the passing of their former prime minister, Pierre Elliot Trudeau. His funeral, which took place on Wednesday, brought Canada's many political factions together for an unusual moment of unity. I would like to take this time to share with my colleagues my thoughts on this momentous event for our neighbors. 
   Pierre Trudeau led Canada at a time when that nation made enormous progress both internally and on the world stage. He served as prime minister from 1968 through 1984, with a brief nine-month hiatus in 1979-80. During these years, Trudeau championed many initiatives, and supervised the process by which Canada replaced its ties to Great Britain with a constitution of its own. His agenda affected Canadian politics for years after he left office. 
   Pierre Trudeau's private life certainly made many headlines, but his most enduring legacy was his success in addressing the separatist movement in his native Quebec. Just two years after assuming the prime minister's post, he won plaudits from the Canadian people for his toughness in dealing with separatist terrorists who had kidnapped a British diplomat and a Quebecois provincial official. Ten years later, in May 1980, Trudeau's leadership and persuasiveness convinced 59.6% of Quebecois to vote against separating from the national government. At the same time, though, he was sensitive to his country's French-speaking population; Canada was made officially bilingual in 1984. 
   I lived in Canada for seven years during the Trudeau era. As an American in this foreign-but-nearby land, I learned first-hand how Pierre Trudeau shaped and influenced the maturation of Canada. Although the United States and Canada certainly had their differences during this era, particularly on matters of arms control, I know that our nation fully respected his abilities and leadership qualities that guided Canada through some momentous times. Our friendly neighbor to the north has lost a great leader, and I hope all of my colleagues will take a moment to recognize the enormous legacy of Pierre Elliot Trudeau. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20001003</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I would like to share with my colleagues my views on several items contained within the energy and water conference report. 
   The FY 2001 Energy and Water Appropriations conference report includes $24 billion in funding for the Department of Energy, civil projects of the Army Corps of Engineers, the Department of Interior's Bureau of Reclamation, and a number of independent agencies. I understand the difficulty of reaching a consensus on such a comprehensive bill. I would like to thank the Managers of the legislation for all their hard work in reaching this consensus. 
   I am particularly pleased with the nearly $4 million in funding included in the bill for a number of important Rhode Island coastal restoration and water development projects. The bill contains $1.95 million in funding for authorized repairs to the Fox Point Hurricane Barrier. Since its construction in 1966, the barrier has provided critical flood protection to the City of Providence. The bill contains $191,000 for Rhode Island Ecosystem Restoration to assist the Army Corps of Engineers and the Rhode Island Department of Environmental Management to restore degraded salt marshes and freshwater wetlands, improve overall fish and wildlife habitats, and restore anadramous fisheries. The bill also contains $54,000 for South Coast Erosion to complete feasibility study work on potential coastal protection projects along the southern coastline of Rhode Island. 
   Additionally, the bill contains $584,000 in funding for the final Environmental Impact Statement and design work associated with maintenance dredging of the Providence River and Harbor federal navigation channel. The proposed maintenance dredging project involves the removal of approximately four million cubic yards of material from the Providence River and Harbor. The Environmental Impact Statement process will allow for full and open debate on the placement of dredge spoils from the project. We certainly cannot overlook the importance of protecting and minimizing the impact on our environment, especially the impact on our fisheries. 
   As we move into the heating season, funding Environmental Impact Statements for Providence Harbor dredging projects cannot be overstated. Specifically, until dredging Providence Harbor is completed, deep draft vessels carrying precious heating oil to Rhode Island and other points in the Northeast will have to continue the dangerous and inefficient practice of off-loading their cargoes into small barges, in the middle of Narragansett Bay, for delivery to the pierside terminals in Providence Harbor. Anyone who has experienced the fury of winter wind, ice, and rough waters on the Narragansett recognizes this practice is an accident waiting to happen--one with disastrous consequences. 
   While I voted in support of the conference report last night, I was disappointed to find that the Missouri River provision I objected to during Senate consideration of the bill was not removed during conference. I firmly object to this provision which would block funding for consideration of one of the alternatives to the Missouri River Master Water Control Manual. The targeted alternative would require seasonal river flow changes along the Missouri River in order to recover three endangered species including the pallid sturgeon, interior least tern, and piping plover. During my past year in the Senate, I have voted to remove environmental riders such as this one from appropriations bills. In my view, the Missouri River provision inappropriately transfers the decision regarding endangered species protection along the Missouri River from the Army Corps of Engineers and the authorizing committees to the Senate and House Appropriations Committees. 
   I was one of two Republican Senators that voted in favor of an amendment offered by Senator DASCHLE and Senator BAUCUS to strike this provision during Senate consideration of the FY 2001 Energy and Water Development Appropriations bill. When the vote failed, however, I voted in favor of the legislation because of its important funding for Rhode Island. The FY 2001 Energy and Water Development Appropriations bill, and the Missouri River provision contained within, passed overwhelmingly in the Senate by a vote of 93 to 1. 
   The legislation still has a probable Presidential veto. I am hopeful we will be able to revisit the Missouri River provision before the end of this session, and ensure its elimination from the legislation. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000928</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, this past weekend, Mount Saint Charles Academy of Woonsocket, Rhode Island, was honored at a ceremony recognizing it as a Blue Ribbon School. I would like to commend them on this outstanding achievement. 
   ``Mount,'' as it is called in Rhode Island has long been recognized nationally for its elite hockey program. In fact, the Mounties hockey team is so good that they have won the last 23 Rhode Island State Championships--a record--and during that stretch they skated their way to ten straight High School National Championships. 
   But in Rhode Island, Mount Saint Charles is best known for its excellent academic reputation. It is great to see ``Mount'' recognized nationally for its academic excellence, not just its hockey. 
   The Blue Ribbon School program rewards schools that excel in all areas of academic leadership, teaching and teacher development, and school curriculum. Schools are chosen through a competitive application process that rates each school on two areas. The first category, ``Conditions of Effective Schooling,'' includes teaching environment, curriculum and instruction, parent and community support, and student environment. The second category, ``Indicators of Success,'' includes student test performance, high attendance and graduation rates, as well as postgraduate pursuits. 
   I am proud to see a Rhode Island school recognized nationally for setting the bar high, and I applaud the teachers, principles, and students who have worked so hard to make Mount Saint Charles a Blue Ribbon School.  </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000914</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. I move to lay that motion on the table. 
   The motion to lay on the table was agreed to. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000727</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today to congratulate Mark Preston and Meredith Ray Bonner on their recent wedding, which took place on July 8, 2000, at the Holy Spirit Catholic Church in Atlanta, Georgia. The groom's parents Eugene and Mary Preston were in attendance, as was the bride's mother, Mrs. Phillip Ray Bonner. 
   Mark proposed on December 28, 1999, in the same parking lot where they first kissed, and the couple spent their honeymoon in North Carolina. 
   As many of you know, Mark is the intrepid Roll Call reporter, famous for stalking unwary Members coming off the Senate floor or leaving the weekly policy lunches. Over time, Mark has become a fixture at the Ohio Clock and on the Hill. 
   The bride, now Meredith B. Preston, is also a journalist, and recently relocated to Washington from Atlanta. In fact, Mark and Meredith met as reporters at the Marietta Daily Journal. 
   I hope the entire Senate will join me in wishing Mark and Meredith the very best today and throughout the future.  </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000727</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, one of my constituents, Virginia Louise Doris of Warwick, RI, has written a beautiful poem that commemorates the life of Francis Scott Key, and his steadfast efforts in penning what has become the words of our National Anthem. Last year I was pleased to share with my colleagues a poem she wrote about the valiant soldiers of World War II. Today, after reading her latest poem, I thought it would be appropriate to share her heartfelt words. 
   Virginia Doris has informed me that she has worked for many years researching the life of Francis Scott Key, and has written a monograph compiling her findings. Her dedication to bringing recognition to this great American is indeed inspiring. I thank her for sharing the poem with me, and wish her continued success in sharing the worthy story of her hero, Francis Scott Key. 
   I ask that a copy of Virginia Doris' poem appear at this point in the RECORD. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000727</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today to speak of an issue which effects every American, and future generations of Americans. 
   As the saying goes, ``burn me once, shame on you, burn me twice, shame on me.'' 
   After the second World War, waves of returning GIs--looking for a better life for themselves and their families--helped create a unprecedented building boom in the United States. The potato fields of Long Island were turned into massive tracts of uniform new houses known as Levittown. This same post-World War II growth at one point so overwhelmed my own home town of Warwick, Rhode Island that the state newspaper described the city as ``a suburban nightmare''. Before long, strip retail development catering to the automobile became the trademark of the American landscape. 
   Our landscape has since been pockmarked by incremental, haphazard development, which too often offends the eye, and saps our economic strength by requiring very expensive investment for extending infrastructure farther and father into the country side. Driving down the street in Anytown USA you see an apartment house next to a fast food franchise, next to a fire station, next to an office building, next to a strip mall. That isn't planned development. 
   Over forty years after Levittown, we find ourselves in a strong economy sustained as never before. At the same time, every state in the country face significant problems relating to unplanned growth, from protecting open space in the east to protecting precious drinking water supplies in the west. We ought to seize the moment and learn from our previous mistakes--we should not be burned twice. 
   The last thing anyone needs, citizens and developers alike, is to have angry and divisive planning board, zoning board or city or town council meetings. The best thing we can do to ensure wise growth is to encourage decision makers to work together with the citizens, developers, interest groups and others to develop a consensus for planning for growth in an orderly manner. 
   That is what the Community Character Act does. 
   Mr. President, I rise today with my colleagues, Senators BENNETT, CLELAND, JEFFORDS, LEVIN, LIEBERMAN and LEAHY to introduce a bill that I believe will help states plan wise growth. This bill, Community Character Act of 2000, seeks to authorize $25 million over four years for a grant program to help states develop or update their land use statutes and Comprehensive Plans. 
   No state in the nation is immune from the effects of rapid unplanned development. Suburbanization is expensive, costing state and local taxpayers dearly for extending roads and infrastructure, and building new schools. Even states considered more rural are now facing rapid alterations in land use and quality of life. 
   Federal grants under this act would help states promote citizen participation in the developing of state plans, encourage sustainable economic development, coordinate transportation and other infrastructure development, conserve historic scenic resources and the environment, and sustainably manage natural resources. 
   I am pleased that this bill has such bipartisan support and hope that the full Senate will give it favorable action. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000720</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today to express my sympathy to the Coverdell family and my own sorrow at the death of Senator Paul Coverdell. May his family find solace in their memory of Paul's many contributions to a better Georgia, a better United States, and a better world. I followed Paul onto the Foreign Relations Committee and also into his chair of the Western Hemisphere Subcommittee. I will do my best to carry on your good work there, Paul. 
   As many people have said, Paul Coverdell was a gifted communicator. To every organization those skills are valuable and especially here in Congress. Perhaps Paul learned those skills at the prestigious Missouri School of Journalism from which he graduated. But I suspect, despite having known him only a short time, that Paul's easy manner and obvious kindness were inherent traits. He was a natural communicator and we mourn his loss. 
   Once again, my heartfelt sympathy to Nancy and all of Paul Coverdell's family and friends. 
   Rest in peace. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000719</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President. I rise today to speak of a man who, during 42 years of public service, left an indelible mark on generations of Rhode Islanders. Like thousands across the Ocean State, I am saddened by the passing of that great American statesman, John Orlando Pastore. Senator Pastore's life and career was one of diligence, accomplishment, integrity and distinction. Senator Pastore set a high standard for all who have followed him in the United States Senate, and while he will be missed, his contributions to our state and country will not be forgotten. My heartfelt condolences are extended to his family and friends in this difficult time. 
   The Nation's first Italian-American governor, and then U.S. Senator, John O. Pastore was rightfully proud of his  heritage and humble roots--and all of Rhode Island was proud of him. Not only did he embody the contributions made by Italian-Americans to our state and nation, his life and career were a source of pride and hope for immigrants from all nations. 
   A child when his father died, leaving his mother and siblings impoverished, the future Senator and Governor struggled to overcome the many daunting obstacles that life had laid in his path. Indeed, the true meaning of Senator Pastore's later personal and political achievements can only be understood when highlighted against the background of his own poignant memories of his childhood, which I would like to quote.  
   We lived in the ghetto of Federal Hill. We had no running water, no hot water. I used to get up in the mornings and have to crank the stove, to go out in the back yard and sift out the ashes and come back with the coal that I could recoup. I had to chisel with the ice pick the ice in the sink so that I could wash up in the mornings. And that was everybody in the family. That wasn't me alone. That was my wife's family, that was everybody's family.  
   A man who never forgot these humble beginnings, Senator Pastore captured the hearts and minds of Rhode Islanders in his conviction that if one worked hard enough and long enough, one's dreams would come true. As one who lived the American Dream, had risen from poverty to political prominence, Senator Pastore strived to extend those same opportunities to all in this country. 
   While Senator Pastore was a gentleman in everything he did, his convictions were equally strong. Whether he was standing up for the rights of the underprivileged, or warning of the dangers of nuclear proliferation, Senator Pastore was not afraid of a political fight. This was a man who, if asked an honest question, always provided an honest answer. 
   Perhaps for his family there is some comfort in knowing that Senator Pastore's career in public service has made the world a better place. He helped guide our state and nation through some of our most tumultuous times--from his pivotal role in the struggle for civil rights legislation to his efforts to protect mankind from the threat of nuclear weapons. Indeed, many in our nation may have marvelled at how a state so small could produce a man so great. 
   As the floor manager for the 1964 Civil Rights Act, Senator Pastore demonstrated his deep devotion for maintaining and promoting the rights of all people, regardless of their race, color or background. As a key player in the negotiation and ratification of the Nuclear Proliferation Treaty and the Nuclear Test Ban Treaty, Senator Pastore helped significantly reduce the dangers of thermonuclear war. On issues as diverse as civil rights and nuclear proliferation, Senator Pastore worked successfully to tighten the sinews of peace against a background of conflict. 
   On a personal note, my father, John Chafee, who followed John Pastore to the Senate in 1976, held his predecessor in the highest esteem. Their relationship consisted of mutual respect, admiration, and a never-ending series of personal kindnesses, great and small. 
   Upon his retirement in 1976, Senator Pastore addressed the Senate one final time. He expressed his love for this great institution and laid out the philosophy that had guided his career.  
   Whatever you do, keep that torch of opportunity lighted. Protect that flag. Maintain our institutions. Debate your differences if you have them. But always realize what that insignia says, ``E pluribus unum''--from the many there are one. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000719</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am pleased to join my colleague from Maine, Senator SNOWE, in introducing a revised version of BRICKS--the Building, Renovating, Improving, and Constructing Kids' Schools Act. This legislation represents a fresh approach to addressing the infrastructure problems in our nation's elementary and secondary schools. 
   Many thanks to Senator SNOWE for her commitment to this issue and for her leadership; to the National PTA and the NEA, both of whom have endorsed the proposal; and special thanks to the Rhode Island Department of Education and Commissioner Peter McWalters for offering suggestions which I believe helped to improve this proposal. 
   As some of you may know, Senator SNOWE first introduced the BRICKS proposal at the end of the last session. In January, I joined as a cosponsor. We had hoped to offer this revised version as an amendment to S. 2 but were unable to do so. As a result, we are introducing the revised version of BRICKS today in a form we hope many of our colleagues will be enthusiastic about cosponsoring. 
   The BRICKS Act would permit the federal government to provide low, or no, interest loans to states to address their serious school infrastructure problems. The National Center for Education Statistics reports that three quarters of our nation's public schools need to build, renovate, improve or modernize their facilities. In some cases the need arises from increased school-age population. In other cases, school facilities are simply old and in need of repair. Today's estimated cost of modernizing and improving school facilities throughout the United States is $127 billion. There is no argument about whether a serious problem exists. There are differences on how best to solve this terribly serious problem. 
   BRICKS recognizes that our nation faces a grave problem. We worry about whether our children are learning enough to compete in the international marketplace, yet we send our children to school in overcrowded classrooms. We tell them to do their best without adequate air conditioning, heating and plumbing. We expect them to learn in buildings with leaky roofs and crumbling walls, or we house them in ``temporary'' classrooms in trailers on school parking lots. 
   In Rhode Island, our schools are old: twenty five percent were built before 1930; another thirty-six percent were built in the 1940s and 1950s; twenty-three percent were built in the 1960s; and thirteen percent were built in the recent 1980s. Between 1986 and 1990, our small State spent about $400 million on school construction projects, averaging about 11 projects per year, and there is much more to be done. My State isn't asking the federal government to step in and take over its school facilities responsibilities or the responsibilities of local communities. Rather, help is being sought at the federal level to meet a critical and immediate need. 
   The legislation which Senator SNOWE and I are introducing today, addresses that need by providing twenty billion dollars in federal loans to the states. Each state receives funds, based on the Elementary and Secondary Education Act's Title I distribution formula, at the request of the Governor. States have until 2003 to request the loans. Fifty percent of the loans must be used to repay the interest on school construction bonds. The other fifty percent may be used to support existing state-administered school construction  programs. Decisions about the use of these federal dollars are made by the Governor in consultation with the director of the state education agency. I am very pleased that the revised legislation encourages the loans to go to those school districts with the greatest need, but the final decisions are made by those closest to the problems. 
   As a former mayor, the person at the local level signing the checks to pay for my community's education needs, I am very familiar with educational priorities at the local level. I am deeply committed to ensuring that the federal government meets its overdue goal of paying up to forty percent of the cost of educating children with special needs. Since coming to the Senate, I have made fully-funding IDEA--the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act--a top priority. This bill links the interest states and localities will be required to pay to the federal level of IDEA funding. 
   Until 2006, there will be zero interest on BRICKS loans. After that, interest will be determined by the federal funding level for IDEA. If federal IDEA funding remains, as it is today, below twenty percent, the loans will remain at zero interest. If the federal spending on IDEA is between twenty and thirty percent, interest will be 2.5 percent. If federal spending on IDEA rises to between thirty and forty percent, interest rises to 3.5 percent. Finally, if the federal government meets its forty percent goal, interest peaks at 4.5 percent. Taking into account federal funding of IDEA seems completely appropriate to me. I hope this linkage of IDEA and spending on school facilities is another step which encourages Congress to meet the goal of fully funding IDEA. 
   Our proposal does not ask the federal government to assume responsibility for building, improving and maintaining school facilities. States and local school districts already have accepted that responsibility by spending more than ever before on facilities. According to the most recent study by the General Accounting Office on school facilities, issued in March 2000, spending on school infrastructure increased by 39 percent from 1990 to 1997. But they cannot do it alone. The federal government can and should help by providing BRICKS loans. 
   I hope that Senators who care about this issue will put aside partisan differences and look carefully at the plan Senator SNOWE and I are proposing. We believe that BRICKS addresses an immediate problem in a responsible manner that does not usurp the authority or responsibility of states and school districts. I urge my colleagues to join as cosponsors of BRICKS. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000719</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, today the Senate is considering and will likely pass Senate Resolution 329, which urges the Government of Argentina to pursue and punish those responsible for the 1994 attack on the AMIA Jewish Community Center in Buenos Aires, Argentina. On June 28th, Senator HELMS joined me in introducing this resolution, which was reported out of the Foreign Relations Committee that same day. 
   Six years ago, a car bomb ripped through the AMIA Jewish Community Center in Buenos Aires, Argentina, killing 86 people and wounding 300 more. Two years before that, a similar attack had devastated the Israeli Embassy in Buenos Aires, killing 29 people and wounding over 200. These heinous terrorist attacks have reverberated loudly in Argentina, home to the largest Jewish community in Latin America. These cowardly acts also reminded us, as Americans, that terrorism can strike anywhere at any moment. 
   I applaud President Fernando de la Rua's stated resolve to bring to justice those responsible for these atrocious crimes. However, the Government of Argentina has not, to this date, succeeded in completing its prosecution of this important case. In addition, investigative findings in Buenos Aires have implicated local authorities--including security officials--as party responsible for the attacks. 
   Senate Resolution 329 is a reiteration of the U.S. condemnation of this terrorist act, as well as a call for justice in Argentina. This resolution not only urges Argentina to punish those responsible for the AMIA bombing, but it also calls on the U.S. Government and the Organization of American States to lend support to this prosecution. 
   Our commitment to assist our neighbors to the south must embody the very principles that have guided our Nation in implementing democratic  governance and the rule of law. In that regard, the United States must continue to speak out about the blatant massacre of innocent people, and the subsequent difficulty in bringing to justice those responsible for this crime. 
   I appreciate the cooperation of all of my colleagues in having this important resolution considered and passed by the Senate. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000718</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. The Senator is correct. This language does not prohibit coordination by Federal agencies funded in the bill. It also is not intended to penalize or disadvantage communities that seek or apply for grants from agencies funded on the bill. Section 326 is limited to prohibiting funding transfers for the Council on Environmental Quality or the Executive Office of the President. Would the Chairman and the Ranking Member agree with this interpretation? </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000630</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I would like to share with my colleagues my views on several items contained within this conference report. 
   Shortly after becoming a Senator, I was named chairman of the Foreign Relations Subcommittee on Western Hemisphere Affairs. One of the most important matters before our subcommittee this year is the Administration's proposed anti-drug aid package for Colombia. The conference report before the Senate today includes $1.3 billion for this plan. 
   On February 25, I called the first hearing of my subcommittee to consider the many facets of this package. I must say that at first, I was quite skeptical of providing such a dramatic increase in anti-drug military aid to Colombia. My concerns centered on whether the United States had a comprehensive long-term strategy for this plan, whether this swift and dramatic infusion of military hardware would result in a worsening of the human rights record of the Colombian military, and whether there were assurances that these funds would not be wasted due to corruption. 
   At our hearing, our subcommittee explored a number of questions about this plan. Key among our witnesses was Jos&#233; Miguel Vivanco, Executive Director of the Americas Division of Human Rights Watch. Mr. Vivanco outlined a report he had just authored documenting the continued links between the Colombian military to the paramilitaries that have been implicated in countless human rights abuses in Colombia. He also touched on the lack of progress in prosecution in Colombia's civilian courts of military personnel accused of human rights abuses. 
   Two months later, I chaired a meeting of the Foreign Relations Committee with the President of Colombia, Andr&#233;s Pastrana. At this meeting, several members of the Committee and other interested Senators were able to discuss in depth with Mr. Pastrana our concerns about this plan. I came away from our meeting fully convinced that President Pastrana is a courageous, reform-minded leader who is committed not only to ending drug trafficking in Colombia, but also to bringing stability, ending violence, and promoting human rights there as well. 
   I am gratified that concerns such as those raised at our subcommittee hearing and our meeting with President  Pastrana received attention as the House and Senate have considered the Administration's plan. In that regard, the conference report before the Senate today includes several stringent requirements, including a series of conditions on the progress of Colombia's military in addressing human rights abuses; $29 million more than the President's request for human rights and justice programs; a requirement that the U.S. President develop a comprehensive strategy with benchmarks; and additional anti-drug funding to neighboring nations so that this problem is not simply exported out of Colombia. 
   Although there remain numerous critics who do not support this plan, I would attest that the provisions in this bill are far better than simply appropriating the funds without condition. With these strong provisions included, I support passage of this anti-drug package for Colombia. 
   However, let's be clear that passage of this plan today is not the end of Congress' consideration of this critical issue. As chairman of the Subcommittee on Western Hemisphere Affairs, I will closely monitor implementation of this aid package to ensure that the conditions enacted by Congress today are carried out responsibly and thoroughly by the Administration. 
   I would also like to mention a rider inserted by the Conference Committee that would prohibit the Environmental Protection Agency from finishing work on a proposed rule revising the Total Maximum Daily Load (TMDL) program under the Clean Water Act. The TMDL issue is an important policy matter, one with significant consequences for public use of our Nation's surface waters and for many businesses, farmers and others who will be affected by the rule. No doubt, this issue is controversial and merits careful consideration and debate. However, the TMDL provision inserted into the Military Construction and Supplemental Appropriations bill inappropriately transfers the decision regarding the TMDL rule from the Environmental Protection Agency to the Senate and House Appropriations Committees. 
   This rider is not germane to the underlying bill, was inserted into the Conference Report without any public debate, and cannot be amended. In my view, important decisions regarding environmental policy should not be made behind closed doors and out of public view. This type of backdoor legislating circumvents the legislative process of debate and amendment, and abuses the public trust. By including this language in a conference report that cannot be amended, Senators must either accept the offensive provision, or vote down an appropriations bill containing important funds for disaster relief, humanitarian aid, and national defense. 
   Since the bill provides critical assistance to people that need help, I reluctantly support its passage. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000630</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, yesterday, the Senate approved S. 148, the Neotropical Migratory Bird Conservation Act. I would like to thank Senator ABRAHAM and Senator SMITH for their work on this important environmental issue, and also offer my family's appreciation for Senator ABRAHAM's kind words regarding my father. Senator John Chafee was a strong proponent of this legislation, and I am proud to follow his lead in cosponsoring this bill. 
   Now, what is a neotropical migratory bird? Simply put, it's a bird that breeds in North America, and migrates each year to tropical habitats in Central and South America. While the name sounds technical and complicated, many of these birds are well-known and well-loved by Americans. Plovers, sandpipers, hummingbirds, woodpeckers, orioles, blackbirds, and many species of raptor and songbird are all neotropical migratory birds. Some of these birds, such as the Ruby-throated Hummingbird and the Killdeer, cover amazing distances as they travel between their summer and winter habitats. 
   In Rhode Island, we are fortunate to be visited by many neotropical migrants including one species of hummingbird, over ten species of raptor,  over 30 species of shorebirds, eight species of flycatcher, six species of thrush, and 35 species of warblers. Rhode Island's location makes it a key stopover spot for many neotropical migrants to refuel and rehydrate. 
   In addition to an excellent location, Rhode Island has important habitat for migratory birds. Its combination of fruit-bearing shrubs and forest provide ample cover and food for these birds to take a break during their migration. The many wetlands found in the state also provide excellent areas to rehydrate, one of the most important needs on a bird's trip north or south. 
   Even with high quality habitat still available in parts of the United States, tragically, many of these species are in real danger. The greatest human threat to neotropical migratory birds is the loss of habitat, particularly in the Caribbean and Latin America. Many neotropical migratory birds stop to rest and feed at several relatively small patches of habitat along their long migrations between continents. Destruction of these stopover areas can have a devastating impact on a species. In addition, overharvesting of timber, loss of wetlands and heavy use of pesticides exact a heavy toll on the habitats on which neotropical migrants depend. As noted in the Committee Report, 90 species of migratory birds are listed as threatened or endangered under the Endangered Species Act, and approximately 210 species in the United States are in serious decline. 
   The challenge of protecting migratory birds is complicated by the reality that many of the most effective conservation measures must be implemented overseas. Migratory birds cross oceans, time zones, and national boundaries. Preservation of these species must involve close partnerships and cooperation with our Caribbean and South American neighbors. 
   Senator ABRAHAM's bill will help address the multitude of threats facing migratory birds by encouraging partnerships between private and public entities and across international boundaries to help protect and restore habitat of neotropical migrants. Importantly, there are ongoing efforts aimed at stopping the decline in migratory bird species; however, these efforts could be enhanced through better coordination and increased funding. S. 148 furthers both goals. Under the bill, the Secretary of the Interior is directed to facilitate the exchange of information among the various groups, and to coordinate existing conservation efforts. The bill also authorizes $25 million over five years in grants for projects to conserve neotropical migratory bird populations. Three-quarters of this funding must be used for projects in other countries to ensure that scarce resources will be focused where they are needed most. 
   In closing, I would like to relate a story that my father used to tell about a family friend traveling in China. This fellow noticed that his surroundings there were strangely silent. Upon reflection, he attributed the ominous quiet to the total lack of birds in the environment. Apparently, in parts of China the destruction of habitat and the commercial bird market have resulted in the virtual elimination of songbirds. What a terrible loss. We must work together to prevent such tragedy from occurring in the Western Hemisphere. And, Senator ABRAHAM's bill is a good step in the right direction. I applaud my colleagues for supporting this measure to help prevent the further decline in our neotropical migratory birds. And, I hope the President will act swiftly to enact the Neotropical Migratory Bird Conservation Act. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000623</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I ask unanimous consent that the order for the quorum call be rescinded. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-2-20000623</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I ask unanimous consent to speak as in morning business. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000623</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, as many of you know, I joined Senators GRAHAM, ROBB, BRYAN, and others in introducing S. 2758, the Medicare Outpatient Drug Act of 2000 this past Tuesday. 
   While I strongly support S. 2758 and urge my colleagues to support it, I was very troubled by the process in this Chamber last night. We talk a good game about wanting to pass legislation on a bipartisan basis. In fact, at a Centrist Coalition meeting earlier this week, many Senators from both sides of the aisle--led by the minority leader--were talking about how the two parties should be working together to produce a prescription drug bill for our Nation's seniors. 
   However, the prescription drug amendment that we debated and voted on last night proved otherwise. It suggested that all the talk about bipartisanship is merely a facade. It was clear from the procedural wrangling that led to the vote on the Robb amendment that there is no intention by the Democratic leadership to work together to fashion a bipartisan compromise on a Medicare prescription drug bill. 
   In fact, it is my understanding that minority leader told others not to let me--one of the author's of this bill--know about this motion ahead of time. That doesn't sound very bipartisan to me. 
   Sadly, the amendment last night really undermines our ability to work toward a compromise to add a prescription drug benefit to Medicare. If we were really interested in producing a bipartisan bill that could be signed into law, we would be working together on a proposal rather than filing motions such as the one last night, which was destined to go down to partisan defeat. 
   I had high hopes when I stood with Senators GRAHAM, ROBB, BRYAN, and others on Tuesday and we announced the introduction of our Medicare Outpatient Drug Act. I had hopes that we would be able to work this bill through the legislative process, give this bill an airing at the Finance Committee, and work with Republicans and Democrats alike to fine-tune it into a product that the President could sign into law. 
   I think most of us here would agree it is time to update the Medicare program to include a prescription drug benefit. I hear about this issue back in Rhode Island more than any other issue. The senior population in Rhode Island is the second largest in the Nation--second only to Florida. The seniors in my State constantly approach me about the high cost of their prescription drug bills. I expect most of us hear more about this issue from our constituents than any other. 
   However, filing procedural motions that are doomed to failure is not the way to achieve this important goal. I am afraid that some on the opposite side of the aisle aren't really interested in passing a Medicare prescription drug bill this year--they would rather that we do nothing and use this issue to try to defeat some of us in the fall. 
   Let's not hold the 39 million Medicare recipients in this country hostage to partisan politics. 
   I believe the legislation I introduced with Senators GRAHAM, ROBB, BRYAN, and others is one of the most responsible and comprehensive drug bills in Congress. And, more important, it would help relieve seniors of the growing burden of high prescription drug bills. 
   However, while I support this legislation and regretfully voted in support of the Robb amendment last night because I am committed to passing a good prescription drug bill to help our Nation's seniors, I do not believe the exercise last night was constructive. Sadly, it was quite the opposite. 
   I thank the Chair. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000622</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I would like to thank the managers of this bill, Senators MCCONNELL and LEAHY, for accepting a revised version of the amendment I submitted yesterday. This amendment addresses international debt relief. 
   Today we are at the dawn of the new millennium--2000 is the Year of Jubilee. It is in this year that people throughout the world have been inspired by the Book of Leviticus in the Hebrew Scriptures. This book describes a Year of Jubilee, in which slaves are freed, land is returned to original owners, and debts are canceled. 
   The Bible's teachings of the Year of Jubilee has led to a worldwide movement to have the world's wealthiest nations forgive the debt of the world's poorest nations. Great Britain, Canada, the Philippines, Australia, Ireland, Austria, Germany, Sweden, South Africa, and the United States have national campaigns in this regard. The most prominent churches and relief groups worldwide also endorse this goal. 
   This spiritual movement in turn is helping motivate the United States and our G-7 allies to put forth the heavily indebted poor countries (``HIPC'') initiative. This groundbreaking effort will provide substantial debt relief to poor nations conditioned on making real progress towards economic growth and poverty reduction. It will also emphasize greater budget discipline within recipient countries so that scarce resources, rather than being wasted, are directed where they are needed most. 
   Although the President requested $435 million this year for the U.S. contribution to the HIPC initiative, the appropriations bill before the Senate today provides just $75 million. The amendment I have authored expresses the sense of the Senate that the United States should authorize and appropriate full funding. This amendment is cosponsored by seventeen of my colleagues, including those who have been leaders on this issue during the past several years. Cosponsors of my amendment are Senators MACK, SARBANES, BIDEN, HAGEL, WELLSTONE, LIEBERMAN, LANDRIEU, DODD, JEFFORDS, LAUTENBERG, GORDON SMITH, DEWINE, LUGAR, FEINSTEIN, GRAMS, INOUYE, and BRYAN. 
   I believe it is important to draw attention to this critical issue, and would again like to thank the bill's managers for accepting my amendment. I am hopeful that in the coming weeks, we will make further progress towards full U.S. participation in the HIPC initiative. Thank you. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000621</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, yesterday the Senate debated an issue of critical importance--preventing hate crimes. Hate crimes are attacks on our very culture. What makes the United States different from places such as the former Yugoslavia, Rwanda, or the Middle East, civilizations which are torn apart by prejudice and hatred, is our acceptance of diversity. The image of the United States as a melting pot, where diversity flourishes, is shattered by news stories of hate related violence. Hate crimes are crimes of intimidation and violence, in which a person's civil rights are threatened because of prejudice. 
   The Hate Crimes Prevention Act, of which I am proud to be a cosponsor, does not create a new law, nor does it federalize more crimes. Rather, it clarifies a law that has been on the books for over thirty years. Federal hate crimes protections were established as part of the Civil Rights Act of 1968. The law sets up a backstop for states that cannot adequately prosecute these hate-based crimes. However, the current law's strict dual intent requirement that the defendant acted because of the victim's race, religion, or ethnicity and because the victim was enjoying or exercising a federally protected right, such as voting or attending public school, is far too constricting. Even the heinous dragging death of James Byrd, Jr. in Jasper, Texas did not qualify under current law as a federal hate crime. Never since the statute was enacted have there been more than 10 prosecutions for hate crimes in a year. 
   The Smith-Kennedy amendment has two major components. First, it expands individuals covered by hate crimes to include sexual orientation, gender, and disability. Second, it eliminates constraints that make the current law ineffective. The federal government, with the approval of a state's Attorney General, would be empowered to prosecute crimes that cause death or bodily injury ``because of the actual or perceived race, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender, or disability'' of the victim. According to FBI statistics, in 1996, almost two-thirds of the reported hate crimes were due to race, while 12% were based on sexual orientation. It is important that protection from hate crimes be extended to all of America's citizens.  
   The Supreme Court has already signaled the constitutionality of hate crime statutes. In Wisconsin v. Mitchell, the Supreme Court unanimously upheld the constitutional right of states to enact hate crimes statutes. I believe that it is now time for Congress to act. 
   Mr. President, I cosponsored the Hate Crimes Prevention Act because it was the right thing to do. The issue here is civil rights, and as a nation we went a long way in the last century toward assuring that the civil rights of ALL Americans were not infringed upon. Let's start this new century with another step in the right direction. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000620</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, although I will vote to table this amendment, I would like to make it clear to my colleagues that I support the concept of establishment of a bipartisan commission to study U.S. policy towards Cuba. 
   For years, an often emotional and politically charged debate on our Cuba policy has gone on here in the U.S. In such an atmosphere, it is often prudent to let a bipartisan commission take a careful look at our policy, assess how well it has worked, and make recommendations for change, if necessary. I think such a solution would be appropriate with respect to our policy towards Cuba. 
   However, I am not convinced that this is the proper time and place to create such a commission. Indeed, under this amendment many of the commissioners would be appointed by a lame-duck President, infringing on the ability of the new President to develop his own Cuba policy. 
   It has become increasingly clear that the 39-year U.S. trade embargo has not succeeded in effecting change in Cuba. Fidel Castro's regime remains in power, and the Cuban people continue to suffer under his brutal dictatorship and a floundering economy. I believe a bipartisan commission would be useful in taking a fresh look at the efficacy of our embargo. Now, however, is not the time to do this. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000620</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am pleased to join Senators GRAHAM, BRYAN, ROBB, CONRAD, and BAUCUS in introducing the Medicare Outpatient Drug (MOD) Act of 2000 today. 
   The Medicare Outpatient Drug Act addresses an area of great concern to our nation's seniors: the need for a Medicare prescription drug benefit. Seniors today are facing staggering and burdensome drug prices. Studies show that the average American over 65 spends more than $700 per year on drug prescriptions. In Rhode Island, seniors pay twice as much for certain prescription drugs as the drug companies' most favored customers (for example, Medicaid and the Veteran's Administration). On average, Rhode Island seniors pay 84 percent more than prescription drug consumers in Canada or Mexico.  
   We must update the Medicare program to include a prescription drug benefit. This bipartisan, comprehensive bill will provide universal coverage to all 39 million Medicare beneficiaries in this country. As you know, Medicare was established in 1965 at a time when prescription drugs were not widely used. These days, drug therapies have replaced overnight stays in hospitals and long convalescence in nursing facilities. In light of this, we must update the Medicare program to keep pace with these scientific and medical advances. 
   This legislation does many things that other legislative proposals do not. First, it provides universal coverage on a voluntary basis to every Medicare-eligible individual. Second, it is based on a standard insurance model, with coinsurance, a deductible, and a defined stop-loss benefit. In other words, once a senior pays $4,000 in annual drug costs, our plan covers the rest. Third, the amount of a senior's premium would be directly related to his/her income, on a sliding scale. In other words, the lowest-income senior will receive the greatest subsidy. Conversely, the highest-income senior will receive the lowest federal subsidy. 
   Finally, this legislation emulates market-based insurance coverage by allowing multiple ``pharmacy benefit managers'' (PBMs) to contract with Medicare to provide the pharmaceutical benefit to seniors. This would ensure competition in the delivery of this benefit, which means a better benefit and lower prices for consumers. This competition would also prevent the government from ``setting'' drug prices. In my view, price setting would weaken the ability of pharmaceutical companies to conduct valuable research and development into new drug therapies that one day may cure diseases such as cancer, Parkinson's Alzheimer's, diabetes, and HIV/AIDS. 
   In sum, I believe our proposal to be one of the most responsible and comprehensive drug bills in Congress. It achieves these twin goals while relieving seniors of the huge burden of high drug bills. Seniors should never have to choose between filling a prescription for needed medication or buying groceries. Sadly, this is often the case today. 
   This past April, I received a letter from an elderly couple in Rhode Island, with a list of their prescription drug expenses for 1999 enclosed. This couple spent almost $7,000 in 1999 on these prescriptions. They are living on a fixed income, and told me that their savings are being wiped out by the high cost of prescription medications. In addition, the grandmother of one of my staffers cannot afford Prilosec, which she needs to prevent nausea. She cannot hold down food without this drug. This grandmother has to get her Prilosec prescription from her daughter, who has it prescribed and then ships it to her mother. 
   This should not be happening. Our bill will ensure that these seniors will get the prescription medications they need without having to wipe out their personal savings or resort to getting the prescription through a relative. 
   I urge my colleagues to join us in supporting this important legislation and finally provide this necessary medical coverage to our nation's seniors.  </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000616</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am pleased to be joined today by Senators KOHL, GRAHAM, and LINCOLN in introducing the Child Support Fairness and Tax Refund Interception Act of 2000. 
   The Child Support Fairness and Tax Refund Interception Act of 2000 closes a loophole in current federal statute by expanding the eligibility of one of the most effective means of enforcing child support orders--that of intercepting the federal tax refunds of parents who are delinquent in paying their court-ordered financial support for their children. 
   Under current law, eligibility for the federal tax refund offset program is limited to cases involving minors, parents on public assistance, or adult children who are disabled. Custodial parents of adult, non-disabled children are not assisted under the IRS tax refund intercept program, and in many cases, they must work multiple jobs in order to make ends meet. Some of these parents have gone into debt to put their college-age children through school. 
   The legislation we are introducing today will address this inequity by expanding the eligibility of the federal tax refund offset program to cover parents of all children, regardless of whether the child is disabled or a minor. This legislation will not create a cause of action for a custodial parent to seek additional child support. It will merely assist the custodial parent in recovering debt that is owed for a level of child support that was determined by a court. 
   Improving our child support enforcement programs is an issue that should be of concern to us all as it remains a serious problem in the United States. According to the most recent Government statistics, there are approximately twelve million active cases in which a child support order requires a noncustodial parent to contribute to the support of his or her child. Of the $13.7 billion owed in 1998, only $6.9 billion has been collected. It is important to note that this data does not include reporting from many states, including Callifornia, New York, Florida, and Illinois. In 1998, only 23 percent of children entitled to child support through our public system received some form of payment, despite Federal and State efforts. Similar shortfalls in previous years bring the combined delinquency total to approximately $47 billion. We can fix this injustice in our Federal tax refund offset program by helping some of our most needy constituents receive the financial assistance they are owed. 
   While the administration has been somewhat successful in using tax refunds as a tool to collect child support payments, more needs to be done. The IRS tax refund interception program has only collected one-third of tardy child support payments. The Child Support Fairness and Tax Refund Interception Act of 2000 will remove the current barrier to fulfilling an individual's obligation to pay child support, while helping to provide for the future of our Nation's children. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000614</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I would like to take a moment to pay tribute to a Rhode Island hero. 
   Mr. President, Lieutenant General John Bruce Blount was just given an Honorary Doctorate Degree from his alma mater, the University of Rhode Island. A former star athlete, a decorated war hero of two wars, Korea and Vietnam, and a man who helped end the Army-McCarthy hearings of the 1950s, Rhode Islanders were happy to welcome him home. 
   The Providence Journal ran this article, ``Hometown Hero Blount to be Honored at URI Graduation,'' about him. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000613</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I want to take a moment to pay tribute to the Telephone Pioneers of America. This tremendous volunteer organization has provided 40 years of volunteer labor service to the repair of talking-book machines for the National Library Service for the Blind and Physically Handicapped of the Library of Congress, Washington, D.C. Since 1960, the Pioneers have provided over $70 million worth of volunteer labor and have repaired nearly 2 million machines. More than a half-million blind and physically disabled individuals benefit from this outstanding volunteer repair service. In Rhode Island alone, Pioneers have volunteered 27,186 hours and repaired 17,146 machines since 1986. 
   The Pioneers are a good-will organization of a million people. This international organization is led by President Irene Chavira of U.S. West, Senior Vice President, Harold Burlingame of AT&T, and Executive Director and Chief Operating Officer James Gadd of Bell South. The organization is further supported by countless special people who make up the association, headquarters advisory board, and sponsoring companies. 
   Concerning the talking-book program itself, there are 1,500 Pioneer men and women who work on talking-book repair. They consist of volunteer personnel from AT&T, Bell Atlantic, Bell South, Lucent Technologies, Southwestern Bell Corporation, SBC, Communications, Inc., and U.S. West. They are ably supported by their Pioneer Vice Presidents and are also ably assisted by regional coordinators. 
   Through the generosity of the sponsoring companies, talking-book repair Pioneers are provided facilities in which they repair the equipment. Further, they are provided funding for tools, while the National Library Service for the Blind and Physically Handicapped provides testing equipment and parts for necessary repairs. The Pioneer organization also ensures talking-book coordinator leadership, including administrative support, management support for the program, and funding for travel to training and for recognition events. 
   The talking-book machines provided by the National Library Services to blind and visually impaired Americans are nothing less than a lifeline. Profound vision loss and blindness can seem like an insurmountable obstacle to what most of us take for granted, reading. We live in the information age, but for blind and visually impaired individuals, most information would be out of reach if it were not for the availability of specially designed talking-book machines. With talking-book machines, and other forms of assistive technology, blind boys and girls, men and women are reading for pleasure, for academic achievement, and for professional advancement. 
   Volunteerism is one of the greatest of all American virtues, and most who given their time for the benefit of others, do so without hope of fanfare. The Telephone Pioneers of America truly have sounded a clarion call for all other volunteer organizations to follow by responding to those in need, and I commend them for it.  </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000608</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. I rise today to introduce the Brownfields Revitalization and Environmental Restoration Act of 2000 together with Senator LAUTENBERG, Senator SMITH of New Hampshire, and Senator BAUCUS. We are introducing this bill today because we support legislation that will expedite cleanup of our nation's hazardous waste sites. We support economic development in our neighborhoods and job creation in our cities. We also support invigorating our urban cores and bolstering local governments. Mr. President, we are introducing this legislation today because, if enacted, it has the potential to fulfill these objectives, which are important to me and I believe to every Senator. 
   Brownfields are typically older commercial or industrial properties at which development is hindered by the presence--or even the potential presence--of hazardous substances. Countless numbers of brownfield sites blight our communities, pose health and environmental hazards, erode our cities' tax base, and contribute to urban sprawl. In fact, the U.S. Conference of Mayors has estimated that more than 450,000 brownfield sites exist nationwide. But, we stand to reap enormous economic, environmental, and social benefits with the successful redevelopment of brownfield sites. The redevelopment of brownfields capitalizes on existing infrastructure, creates a robust tax base for local governments, attracts new businesses and jobs, reduces the environmental and health risks to communities, and preserves community character. This can truly be a victory for everyone. 
   While everyone agrees that brownfield sites should be cleaned up, presently there are many problems that prevent us from cleaning up these sites. Let me address the problems and how our legislation poses solutions. 
   Problem: There is not enough funding to address the large number of brownfield sites that exist. 
   Solution: The bill authorizes $150 million per year to state and local governments to perform assessments and cleanup at brownfield sites. It also authorizes $50 million per year to establish and enhance State brownfield programs. 
   Problem: Communities that strive to clean up sites, such as Riverside Mills alongside the Woonasquatucket River in Providence, in order to turn them into greenspace, cannot since there will be no future income stream to repay a loan. 
   Solution: The bill will allow EPA to issue grants to state and local governments to clean up sites that will be converted into parks or open space. 
   Problem: People who bought brownfield sites and did not cause the contamination could be liable under Superfund. 
   Solution: The bill clarifies that innocent landowners, that act appropriately, are not responsible for paying cleanup costs. 
   Problem: Developers that want to purchase brownfield sites may be liable for future cleanup costs. 
   Solution: The bill encourages developers to purchase and develop brownfield sites by exempting from liability prospective purchasers that do not cause or worsen the contamination at a site. 
   Problem: Superfund liability issues prevent development of areas near contaminated sites. 
   Solution: The bill includes an exemption from Superfund liability for contiguous property owners. 
   Problem: Investors do not clean up brownfield sites because for fear that EPA will ``second-guess'' their actions. 
   Solution: The bill offers finality by precluding EPA from taking an action at a site being addressed under a state cleanup program unless there is an ``imminent and substantial endangerment'' to public health or the environment, and additional work needs to be done. 
   I am proud to introduce this bill with my esteemed colleagues from the Environment and Public Works Committee. The fact that this bill is sponsored by the Chairman and Ranking Minority Member of the Superfund Subcommittee and the Environment and Public Works Committee speaks very highly for the bipartisan efforts to achieve consensus on this issue. A factor critical to the success of this legislation, will be continued bipartisanship. We must continue to reach across the aisle; we must continue to find common ground; and we must continue to work cooperatively to move this legislation. I urge all Senators to support this legislation, which can--and should--be enacted this year. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000607</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, on June 16th, family, friends and colleagues will gather to honor Richard W. Cannon, who has served the Social Security Administration for 39 years, and is retiring as District Manager of the Providence, RI office. 
   Mr. Cannon has demonstrated an exemplary record of service to New England and the Social Security Administration (SSA). He began his career with SSA as a Claims Representative in the Pawtucket, RI office in September, 1961. He quickly rose through the ranks, receiving promotions to field Representative, Operations Supervisor, Branch Manager, Assistant District Manager, and finally to District Manager by 1976. He has held the position of District Manager for 24 years in three offices: New London, CT; Cambridge, MA; and since May 1987, Providence. 
   Not only has Rhode Island benefited from Richard's services, but regions across the country have as well. He served stints in Social Security Administration offices in New York, California, and Hawaii, But, it has been our good fortune that he continues to return to his home state of Rhode Island. 
   He has shared his knowledge and expertise not only with his office colleagues, but with members of the Rhode Island Federal Executive Council, which he led as chairman for two years, and the New England Social Security Managers Association, where he also held office. 
   Lest we think that Richard's life was dedicated solely to the Social Security Administration, he also enjoys the outdoors. I have it on good authority that he can often be seen leaving his home in Snug Harbor to cruise the waters of Narrangansett Bay, hoping to entice a fish or two to join him in his boat. 
   As Richard prepares for his private life away from the duties of his terribly  demanding job, I want to congratulate and thank him for all that he has given to the Social Security Administration and his community.  </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000525</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, on May 6th, twenty-five outstanding students from Central Falls High School in Rhode Island visited Washington to compete in the national finals of the ``We The People ..... The Citizen And The Constitution'' program. This is the third time that the Central Falls High School team has won the statewide competition, and I would like to commend their achievement. 
   The ``We The People ..... The Citizen And the Constitution'' program focuses on teaching our nation's students about the history, philosophy, and meaning of the Constitution and the Bill of Rights, as well as increasing civic participation. The national finals competition simulates a congressional hearing in which students testify as constitutional experts before a panel of judges. 
   I am very proud of Francisco Araujo, Sean Brislin, Andrzej Budzyna, Delia Buffington, Eloisa Dellagiovanna, Rachel Dittell, Renee Dittell, Matthew Doucett, Ricky Ferreira, Hipolito Fontes, Michelle Fontes, Sonia Gaitan, Jennifer Golenia, Joshua Lapan, Celia Marques, Edward Pare, Kassandra Reveron, Helen Reyes, Kathleen Roach, Amy Rodrigues, Anthony Rodrigues, Jennifer Savard, Cassie Tripp, Monica Vicente, and Leslie Viera for making it to the national finals. I applaud this terrific group of young men and women for their hard work and perseverance. Also, Mr. President, I want to congratulate Jeffry Schanck, a fine teacher who deserves so much credit for guiding the Central Falls High School team to the national finals. 
   Mr. President, it is encouraging to see young Rhode Islanders participating in the ``We The People ..... The Citizen And the Constitution'' program. They have learned that the Constitution is not just a piece of paper, but a living document that all Americans should cherish. It gives me great hope for the future of Rhode Island and our nation.  </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000524</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, today the Senate will be in a period of morning business until 11 a.m. and will begin consideration of S. 2603, the legislative branch appropriations bill. It is hoped that an agreement regarding debate time and amendments can be made so that a vote on final passage can be scheduled for this afternoon. Under a previous consent agreement, there are 40 minutes remaining on FEC nominees Brad Smith and Danny McDonald. Votes on those nominations, as well as the judicial nominations debated yesterday, are expected to be stacked this afternoon. Senators will be notified as those votes are scheduled. 
   I thank my colleagues for their attention. 
   I yield the floor. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000413</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today to express my opposition to H. Con. Res. 290, the Budget Resolution for FY 2001 Conference Report that the Senate is voting on today. I feel it is important to note that despite my opposition, I have deep and abiding respect for Budget Committee Chairman DOMENICI and recognize and appreciate the hard work, expertise, and excellent leadership that he has displayed in the Senate's consideration of the federal budget. 
   There is much to praise in Chairman DOMENICI's budget. Increased funding for education and defense. A reserve fund of $40 billion for a prescription drug benefit. Provisions to do away with budgetary gimmicks. A Social Security Lock-Box. But, there is just too much money set aside for tax cuts, and not enough for paying down the debt. 
   While I support some targeted tax cuts, such as the low-income housing tax credit, and marriage penalty relief, I believe that $150 billion over five years in tax cuts is too much. Instead, I believe it makes more sense to pay down the debt. The federal debt--currently $5.7 trillion, with interest costs of over $200 billion per year, or almost 12 percent of annual federal outlays--represents a huge burden that should not be passed on to our children and to our grandchildren. Not only is this massive debt a problem, but by paying down the debt we would free up more than $200 billion per year. That money eventually could be used to ensure the solvency of Social Security and Medicare; to increase funding for education, specifically, Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA); needed infrastructure and environmental improvements; and to provide for tax relief. 
   Let me take a few moments to explain a number of my votes from last week during the Senate's consideration of the Budget Resolution. I voted for an amendment offered by Senator CONRAD that would have reduced the tax cuts in the Budget Resolution from $150 billion over five years to $75 billion for tax cuts and $75 billion for debt relief. I also voted for an amendment offered by Senator VOINOVICH that would have struck all tax relief from the Budget Resolution so that it may be used for debt relief. Believing that the approach taken by Senator LAUTENBERG was more fiscally responsible, I voted in favor of his amendment because it contained only $59 billion in tax cuts and provided for more debt relief. Finally, I voted against the Budget Resolution as it was reported from Committee because it contained a too high level of tax cuts and not enough debt relief. 
   All of us who have had to pay interest--be it on our house, car, credit card, or other payment--know that these costs are painful. We need to apply the same fiscal discipline here in Congress that we apply at home. To pay out 12 percent of our revenues annually on interest costs rather than on education, needed infrastructure construction and improvements, and to ensure the solvency of the Social Security and Medicare programs, seems to me to be a poor investment of taxpayer dollars. Therefore, in an effort to encourage fiscal discipline and responsibility, I am casting my vote against the Budget Resolution Conference Report. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000413</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am pleased to be joined today by Senators BRYAN, THOMPSON, and SARBANES in introducing the State Children's Health Insurance Program (SCHIP) Preservation Act of 2000. 
   This legislation addresses what I believe to be an unintended consequence of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997 (BBA), which created the State Children's Health Insurance Program (SCHIP) to provide health insurance coverage to millions of our nation's uninsured children. Specifically, the BBA called for states to enroll 2.5 million uninsured children in SCHIP within three years of enactment of the bill. According to the Health Care Financing Administration, states enrolled 1.98 million children in SCHIP in 1999. While this represents an increase in states' enrollment efforts, we need to ensure that the federal government is financially committed to this program, and thus to providing health insurance to our nation's children. 
   SCHIP was designed to allow states to spend each year's allotment over a three-year period; if a state began its program in 1998, it has until the end of 2000 to spend its 1998 allotment. The legislation we are introducing today will extend this year's looming deadline through the end of Fiscal Year 2002, thus allowing states to keep their unexpended SCHIP allotments for up to a total of five years. Many states have had difficulties conducting outreach and enrolling SCHIP-eligible children. We must not penalize states that need more time to identify and enroll children in this important program. 
   Without this bill, the result--whether intended or unintended--would be a potential reduction of up to $4 billion for children's health programs throughout the country. A reduction of this magnitude would undermine many critical programs that provide quality health coverage to needy children. It may also inhibit the ability of states to provide services for children already enrolled in SCHIP, as well as encouraging some states to scale back on outreach and enrollment efforts. For example, under current statute, Rhode Island will lose approximately $8 million annually starting in Fiscal Year 2001. This loss will undermine the efforts of the state to target and enroll every child who is eligible for SCHIP in Rhode Island. Reductions in SCHIP allotments to states will mean that SCHIP-eligible children who are not yet enrolled in the program may continue to go without health insurance. 
   Data from the U.S. Census Bureau shows that the number of children without health insurance increased from 9.8 million children in 1995 to 11.1 million children in 1998. This increase in the uninsured rate occurred in spite of the enactment of SCHIP in 1997. We must not allow this trend to continue. States need to be able to tap into their unexpended SCHIP funds to continue their outreach and enrollment efforts. At a time when our nation's uninsured rate continues to climb above 44 million, it makes little sense to be reducing these much needed SCHIP payments to states that are desperately trying to reach out to and enroll these vulnerable and needy children. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000412</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, as chairman of the Subcommittee on Western Hemisphere Affairs, it is a great pleasure to welcome the President of Colombia to the Senate of the United States. I have been listening with rapt attention. He has been trying to explain to us his hopes for the future. 
   Thank you, Mr. President. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000407</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am pleased to join with Senator JEFFORDS, Chairman of the Health, Education, Labor, and Pensions Committee, and a bipartisan group of Senators in offering this amendment which reaches the goal of fully-funding IDEA--the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act--within five years. 
   IDEA was first enacted in 1975 and authorizes funding, mostly in the form of state grants, to assist states in paying for educational services for disabled young people from 3-21. It requires states which provide public education, also to provide a ``free, appropriate public education'' to this population. Prior to enactment, an estimated 2 million young people either were not receiving any public educational services, or the services they were receiving were inadequate. A number of judicial decisions held that it was unconstitutional for States which provide public education to withhold services from a specific group--the disabled. As a result, States felt compelled to provide educational services to individuals with disabilities and sought help to do so at the Federal level. 
   The Federal Government responded by enacting IDEA. This important protection for young people with disabilites suggests that the Federal Government will pay for up to 40 percent of the average per pupil expenditure for these students. Regrettably, despite Republican efforts to increase IDEA funding each year for the past several years, we have fallen far short of that goal. Also, Senator DOMENICI has included a significant increase for IDEA in this Budget Resolution that is before us, and I commend him for his effort to address this problem. But I believe we must do even more. 
   I would like to read the lead paragraph from an article that appeared in the Providence Journal yesterday on this subject. Headline: ``Special-ed costs soaring, board is told.'' Dateline: Warwick--I was Mayor of Warwick for seven years and am very familiar with its funding needs:  
   The school committee was told last night that the system's special education costs, already a heavy burden for schools throughout the state, are continuing to grow and that there will be less federal money around to help pay for it next year.  
   Already at 20 percent of the city's education budget, the article went on to say, special education is the fastest growing cost for the school district. 
   It's important to remember that typically school costs are borne by property taxpayers. If we want to help the taxpayers, we should be helping the property taxpayers. This is a message that will resonate back home. 
   Of course, this situation isn't unique to Warwick or a problem just in Rhode Island. I would venture to say that there probably isn't a Senator in this Chamber who hasn't heard from his state's school boards about the spiraling costs of special education. Now, Senator JEFFORDS has crafted an amendment which will bring Federal funding for special education up to the promised 40 percent level within five years. This is an amendment in which I believe wholeheartedly, and I urge my colleagues to vote for it. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-2-20000407</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, on rollcall vote No. 73, I voted aye. It was my intention to vote no. Therefore, I ask unanimous consent that I be permitted to change my vote, since it would in no way change the outcome of the the vote. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000406</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am sending amendment No. 2944 to the desk for immediate consideration. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-2-20000406</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. I ask unanimous consent reading of the amendment be dispensed with. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-3-20000406</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am pleased to be joined by a bipartisan group of cosponsors, including Senators MIKULSKI, SNOWE, and GRASSLEY, in offering this amendment. 
   In 1990, Congress passed legislation to authorize the Centers for Disease Control to pay for screening tests to detect breast and cervical cancer on low-income and uninsured women. Regrettably, this legislation did not authorize the treatment for those screening tests tragically indicating cancer. I cannot believe any legislator would not want to correct this omission. 
   Diagnosis without treatment is leaving women with the life-threatening disease nowhere to turn. Screening must be coupled with treatment to reduce mortality. Specifically, the sense of the Senate mirrors legislation introduced by Senator John Chafee which would give States the option to provide treatment through the Medicaid program for women diagnosed with breast or cervical cancer under the CDC screening program. I truly believe this is a corrective measure. 
   Yes, this program costs $315 million over 5 years. However, the House included funding for this program in its budget 2 weeks ago, and the House leadership has committed to a vote on this bill by Mother's Day, May 14. 
   This is not a permanent entitlement. Women would only be eligible for Medicaid during the duration of treatment. The coverage would continue only until the treatment and followup visits are completed. Without Medicaid coverage, we are leaving these women to an unreliable, fragile, and deteriorating system of charity care where they are often unable to get the treatment they need. Only about 6,200 women nationwide would be eligible for Medicaid under this legislation. This small investment stands to save lives for low-income and uninsured women with breast and cervical cancer all over America. Since we have already made the commitment in Congress to diagnose these women, we owe it to them to provide followup treatment. 
   I urge my colleagues to join me in supporting this amendment. We must finish the job we started in 1990 by filling this gap in a vital Federal program. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-4-20000406</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I voted against the amendment offered by Senator ROBB, which would use the tax code to provide assistance to school districts to build and renovate school facilities. There is no doubt that many states and local school districts need help to address the dilapidated conditions of their schools. However, I do  not believe that the approach presented by Senator ROBB, which has been repeatedly defeated by the Senate, is the best solution. 
   Earlier this year, I was pleased to cosponsor legislation known as BRICKS--the Building, Renovating, and Constructing Schools Act--which Senator SNOWE introduced. Senator SNOWE's bill authorizes the use of $20 billion for school construction and repairs. She pays for her proposal by borrowing from the Exchange Stabilization Fund (ESF). 
   According to the Snowe proposal, states would receive funds only at the request of the Governor. They would be distributed in accordance with the formula prescribed under Title I, which provides federal assistance to the lowest achieving, low income students. I believe this is a far better approach with potential for bipartisan support. 
   Mr. President, it will be regrettable if the outcome of the vote on the Robb amendment prevents a vote on an amendment by the senior Senator from Rhode Island, Senator REED. I am an original cosponsor of the Reed amendment which simply expresses the sense of the Senate that gun safety provisions approved by the Senate last year should be brought before the Senate for final action. As a cosponsor of the Reed amendment and a strong supporter of gun safety laws, particularly those which are intended to keep guns out of the hands of children, my vote against the Robb amendment should in no way be considered a vote against the Reed amendment. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000406</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am pleased to join Senators HARKIN and BOB GRAHAM in introducing the Kids Deserve Freedom From Tobacco Act of 2000, which would give the Food and Drug Administration the authority to regulate the manufacture and sale of tobacco. This legislation is a common-sense and bipartisan approach to ensure that tobacco products do not get into the hands of minors, especially in light of the Supreme Court's recent decision that the FDA does not have the authority to regulate tobacco products. 
   The Supreme Court's recent decision is disappointing. This judgment, while following the letter of the law, will cause unnecessary harm to millions of people unless Congress acts quickly to stem its affects. We must ensure that the FDA regulations are enacted into law. 
   Not only does tobacco pose a significant risk to the individual smoker, but it reaps a high cost from the American public. The widespread use of tobacco is eating away at our society's physical and financial health. Tobacco's physical toll in deaths and diseases is well-documented. However, the financial weight that tobacco places on America's overburdened health care system is often overlooked. As the single most preventable cause of premature death, disease and disability facing our nation, tobacco use is also the single biggest preventable expense to our nation's health care system. 
   America's publicly financed health care system has also suffered. Nearly half the costs of treating tobacco related illnesses--approximately $25 billion in 1993, according to the Centers for Disease Control--fall to state and federal governments through such programs as Medicare and Medicaid. This  unnecessary fiscal burden has hit the health care industry hard, increasing the cost of health care, while driving millions into the ranks of the uninsured. As Congress struggles to pull the Medicare program back from the brink of insolvency, it is clear that the huge costs of the preventable illnesses caused by tobacco need to be addressed. We have a clear choice: attack the problem of preventable disease, or place a greater burden on our already financially strapped health care system. 
   The Supreme Court did not argue the scientific evidence: nicotine is a drug and cigarettes are drug delivery devices. Nicotine is addictive, it lures children, kills adults, and drives up our nation's health care costs. In fact, the Court's majority opinion admitted that tobacco use was ``perhaps the single most significant threat to public health in the United States.'' 
   The only thing the FDA lacks, they said, was explicit authority to regulate tobacco products. Fine! Today, we propose to give them that authority. This bipartisan measure will abide by the intent of the Court's ruling by granting the FDA explicit authority to regulate these deadly and addictive products as it does for all other drugs. 
   Congress cannot afford to wait. The three thousand children who get hooked on tobacco each day cannot afford to wait. Our overburdened health care system cannot afford to wait. I hope my colleagues in both Houses of Congress will come together in a bipartisan spirit to grant the FDA authority to stop the spread of the tobacco contagion. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000405</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today in support of Senator ROTH's amendment to the budget resolution, and I thank the Senator for his leadership on matters relating to the future of the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge, or ANWR. The purpose and rationale behind the Roth amendment is simple: We should not include revenue assumptions in the budget based on oil development that will not, and should not, occur. Such faulty assumptions make poor fiscal policy and poor environmental policy. The Arctic Refuge is a national treasure. I support Senator ROTH's efforts to designate the area as wilderness, and I am pleased to add my name as a cosponsor to the Roth wilderness bill. 
   The crux of this debate is on our values, our legacy, and what we want to pass on to future generations. Senator BAUCUS mentioned the Serengeti National Park in Africa, an area immortalized in the human imagination for its beauty and majesty. This amazing park exists because previous generations had the foresight to preserve and protect this area from development. As Senator BAUCUS said, the Coastal Plain of the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge is referred to as the ``American Serengeti.'' And like its counterpart in Africa, this area deserves to be protected for us, our children, and our grandchildren. 
   In 1980, in recognition of the area's immense environmental value, as Senator ROTH said, Congress formally established the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge. At that time, and after much debate and deliberation, Congress made the wise decision to prohibit drilling in the Coastal Plain pending further review. 
   Now, only a short 20 years later, efforts are underway to open this area to development. 
   I urge my colleagues to resist these efforts, to look past our short term needs, and designate the area as wilderness for future generations. The very definition of a ``refuge'' means an area of sanctuary, shelter and protection. In the case of our wildlife refuges, this means protecting nature from drilling, road construction, combustion engines and all of the other harmful effects of human beings and their machines. A large portion of the Alaskan North Slope is already open to oil exploration or drilling; we should not subject ANWR to the same fate. 
   Some have voiced concern at our increasing dependence on foreign oil, and our lack of a coherent national energy policy. I share these concerns, and agree completely that our country must take steps to improve our energy security. But the solution to our energy problems does not lie underneath the coastal plain of ANWR, and drilling there cannot become our energy policy. Remember, by definition, a refuge is a place providing protection or shelter--it is a haven, a sanctuary--we must make sure that ANWR remains a haven, a sanctuary. 
   I thank my colleagues for their consideration, and I respectfully urge them to support the Roth amendment. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000330</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, today I am introducing a pair of bills to enhance the pace and effectiveness of brownfields redevelopment throughout the country. The first bill, entitled the ``State and Local Brownfields Revitalization Act of 2000'', will authorize the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers to remediate and restore brownfield sites owned by state and local governments. The second bill, S. 2334, which I introduce with Senator JEFFORDS, will expand coverage of the federal brownfields tax incentive and extend it for an additional six years. I also am adding my name as a co-sponsor to the ``Small Business Brownfields Redevelopment Act of 1999'', S. 1408, authored by Senator JEFFORDS. Along with these initiatives, I am announcing my intention to develop broader legislation to remove barriers to the redevelopment and restoration of brownfields. 
   Brownfields are abandoned, idled, or under-used commercial or industrial properties at which development or expansion is hindered by the presence, or potential presence of hazardous substantives. Countless numbers of brownfield sites blight our communities, pose health and environmental hazards, erode our cities' tax base, and contribute to urban sprawl. In fact, in 210 cities surveyed by the U.S. Conference of Mayors, an estimated 21,000 brownfields sites covering more than 81,000 acres were identified. But, we stand to reap enormous economic, environmental, and social benefits with the successful redevelopment of brownfield sites. The redevelopment of brownfields capitalizes on existing infrastructure, creates a robust tax base for local governments, attracts new businesses and jobs, mitigates urban sprawl, and reduces the environmental and health risks to communities. 
   Yet, many of these contaminated sites sit abandoned because of the presence of hazardous substances. Developers that would otherwise restore these properties choose not to for fear of becoming tangled in liability under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, commonly referred to as Superfund. I believe it is critical that Congress take action to ensure that the federal government provides funding and incentives to recycle our nation's contaminated land, remove barriers to development, and ally perceived fears associated with Superfund liability. The bills I am introducing today are a step toward resolving those concerns. 
   Let me take a moment to take a moment to explain each one. 
   The first bill I am introducing today is the ``State and Local Brownfields Revitalization Act of 2000.'' This legislation would authorize the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers to establish and implement a program to assist state, regional, and local governments in the remediation and restoration of brownfields sites tied to the quality, conservation, and sustainable use of the nation's waterways and watershed ecosystems. 
   Additionally, this bill would provide authority to the Corps to conduct site characterization and planning, site design and construction, environmental restoration, and preparation for site development on brownfields sites owned by state, regional, or local governments. When selecting these projects, the Corps must consider whether the project would improve public health and safety, encourage sustainable economic and environmental redevelopment in areas serviced by existing infrasture, and help cure or expand parks, greenways, or other recreational property. 
   Activities by the Corps would be contingent upon a 35 percent match in cash or in-kind contribution by the state, regional, or local government. The bill limits the Corps to spending $3,250,000 on an individual site. However, the Secretary of the Army could increase the cap to $5,000,000 if he determines that the size of the site or the level of contamination warrants additional funds. To carry out the provisions of this Act, the bill authorizes annual appropriations of $100 million for fiscal years 2001 through 2005. 
   I believe this bill would make a significant, positive contribution to the revitalization of our communities. Recently, I toured two sites along the banks of the Woonasquatucket River in Providence. At the turn of the century these sites housed a woollen mill and a lace and braid factory. They have been abandoned, but debris and contamination soils remain. They also threaten the river and the children that inevitably explore these abandoned properties. City officials and local residents have a wonderful vision for the cleanup of these sites that would create a bike path and a park along the Woonasquatucket River. This effort is integral to the success of the Woonasquatucket River Greenway Project, a public-private initiative to increase recreational and green space in low-income neighborhoods, thereby promoting economic reinvestment in the area. 
   Despite selection of this project as a federal Brownfields Showcase Community and contributions totaling over $1 million by the City and State, the community is unable to complete remediation activities. And, because the area is intended for use as a local park and will not generate an income stream, the community cannot utilize a loan. In the meantime, the area remains an eyesore. This bill would revitalize the neighborhoods surrounding the Woonasquatucket River, as well as many other projects around the country. 
   The Army Corps of Engineers is not new to brownfields redevelopment. The Corps currently conducts pre-remedial activities at brownfields sites for EPA on a fee-for-service basis. However, current law precludes it from carrying out the necessary cleanup activities. In addition, the Corps is limited to conducting activities for which EPA will provide reimbursement. I believe that EPA's brownfields budget is inadequate  to complete the task at hand. My bill will address these deficiencies and spur revitalization at many sites. 
   The second bill (S. 2334), which I am introducing with Senator JEFFORDS addresses two key deficiencies in current law. It would expand the definition of a targeted area to include any brownfield site located within a metropolitan statistical area making the current tax incentives more useful; and extending it for an additional six years. 
   Under current law, parties that remediate brownfields sites in targeted areas are eligible to expense, or deduct, the costs of environmental restoration in the year the costs are incurred. A targeted area is any population census tract with a poverty rate of more than 20 percent, any empowerment zone or enterprise community, or any site deemed to an EPA pilot project before February 1, 1997. This tax incentive is scheduled to expire at the end of 2001. 
   The vast underutilization of the existing tax incentive highlights the need for a re-examination of the goals we are pursuing. As chairman of the Environment and Public Works Subcommittee on Superfund, Waste Control, and Risk Assessment, I have heard complaints that parties eager to utilize the existing federal tax incentive have not done so for one of two reasons. The first reason is the limitation on the areas covered by the incentive. Unless the project constitutes an early EPA pilot project or lies within an impoverished community, the tax incentive does not apply. In addition, the tax incentive expires frequently, which creates uncertainty. 
   Let me provide an example. Let us assume that a party is willing to purchase contaminated land and clean it up in order to redevelop the property. However, a party may be unable to make the acquisition and complete the remediation within one calendar year. Uncertain as to whether the tax incentive will be reinstated in the next year may discourage the party from taking on the risk. To address this issue, the bill extends the tax incentive until the end of calendar year 2007. I believe that this will provide certainty to those who see the wisdom in redeveloping these untapped properties of value. 
   In addition, I am pleased to add my name as co-sponsor to the Small Business Brownfield Redevelopment Act of 1999 (S. 1408) offered by Senators JEFFORDS, MOYNIHAN, SCHUMER, LAUTENBERG, LIEBERMAN, and LEAHY. This bill is an important component of my vision for brownfields redevelopment throughout the nation. S. 1408 provides $50 million to the Small Business Administration to finance projects that assist qualified small businesses, or prospective small business owners, in carrying out site assessment and cleanup activities at brownfields sites. I believe that this bill will assist small businesses in Rhode Island and the country cleanup brownfield sites. 
   In conclusion, I would like to emphasize that brownfields are a critical national issue, because abandoned or underused properties dot every community, large and small. The bills I have introduced and co-sponsored today are critical components of the bigger picture, but we can do more. To complement these initiatives, I am announcing today that I intend to work on legislation to provide funding through the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency for assessment and cleanup of brownfields, and clarify liability to encourage the transfer of property. I would also like to provide assurances that while we work to facilitate state cleanup programs, EPA will take action at a brownfields site when necessary to protect human health and the environment. 
   As I have studied CERCLA and Rhode Island's Superfund sites, I have heard from many people of all political stripes that brownfields legislation can be achieved on a bipartisan basis. They have urged us to address the issues as soon as possible. I have visited brownfields sites in Rhode Island and have seen the potential that exists to revitalize our communities if we can provide sufficient funding, clarify liability issues, and remove other barriers to redevelopment. I am hopeful that if we work in a bipartisan manner, we will be successful in passing brownfields legislation that the President can sign this year. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000330</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today in support of S. 835, the Estuary Habitat Restoration Partnership Act. Senator John H. Chafee was the sponsor of this bill; indeed, it was one of his top environmental priorities this Congress. Like the many supporters of this bill, I believe this legislation is needed to turn the tide and start restoring the valuable estuarine habitats that are literally disappearing along our Nation's coasts. I hope all of my colleagues in the House and Senate will join me in working towards its timely enactment. 
   I would like to briefly discuss the importance of estuaries to the hundreds of different animals that live in or near these waterbodies. Estuaries are defined as waterbodies where the river's current meets the sea's tide. These waterbodies are truly unique areas where life thrives. The food chain begins in estuaries, and many of them produce more harvestable human food per acre than the best Mid-western farmland. An astonishing variety of life, including animals as diverse as lobsters, whooping cranes, manatees, salmon, otters, bald eagles, and sea turtles all depend on estuaries for their survival. The San Francisco Bay area alone is home to approximately 255 bird species, 81 mammal species, 30 reptile species and 14 amphibian species. And we cannot forget the importance of estuaries to the human species. As you look around the country--some of our most beloved cities: Boston, New Orleans, San Francisco, New York, Seattle--are located alongside estuaries. 
   While some may disagree, I would have to strongly argue that the most precious estuary is Narragansett Bay, located in my home State of Rhode Island. Rhode Island is ``the Ocean State;'' The anchor adorns our State flag; and we have an official State shell, the Quahog. And, we are known for our sailing, seafood and beaches. Tourism, fishing and other bay-related businesses fuel the regional economy. As a Rhode Islander, it is clear that our welfare depends on a clean, healthy, and productive bay. 
   The bottom line is that we are not doing enough for these valuable resources. The combination of development and pollution in our coastal areas has resulted in a widespread decline in estuary habitat. Estuaries are national treasures, and they deserve a national effort to protect and restore them. 
   The Estuary Habitat Restoration Partnership Act answers the growing challenge of estuary restoration. It sets a goal of restoring one million acres of estuary habitat by the year 2010. This bill emphasizes the crucial ingredients of successful habitat restoration projects: effective coordination among different levels of government; continued investment by public and private sector partners; and, most importantly, active participation by local communities. 
   Some of the key provisions of the bill are: a $315 million authorization over 5 years for habitat restoration projects; creation of a council to help develop a national strategy for habitat restoration; and a cost-sharing requirement to help leverage Federal dollars. S. 835 also promotes ongoing restoration efforts by reauthorizing the Chesapeake Bay Program and the Long Island Sound Estuary Program. 
   And, the bill makes a significant and necessary change in the EPA's National Estuary Program. Up until now, the 28 designated estuaries of national significance--including Narragansett Bay--could only use Federal funds to develop conservation and management plans. This bill amends the program to allow NEP grants to be used to implement the conservation measures included in those plans, and it doubles the authorization for the National Estuary Program. Indeed, a central theme of this legislation is the need to carry out projects within existing plans and get moving with on-the-ground restoration activities. 
   Responding effectively to the growing threats to our bays, sounds and other coastal waters presents a tremendous challenge: Federal resources are scarce, the need is great, and the pressure on these areas is intensifying. Yet, I am encouraged by the enormous support--at the local, State and Federal levels--for taking action to arrest the deterioration of our estuaries, and to reverse the trend through restoration projects. And, these restoration  projects do work. Simply by storing the flow of saltwater to a marsh, or dredging a salt pond to its original depth, we allow nature a chance to revive and flourish. 
   As the former Mayor of Warwick, RI, I have experienced first hand the complexity of restoring estuary habitat degraded by pollution. The City of Warwick surrounds Greenwich Bay, which contains some of the most productive shellfish beds in Rhode Island. In 1992, bacterial contamination closed the entire area to shell fishing. My city responded with the Greenwich Bay Initiative, an ongoing effort to restore the estuary. With help from the State, the Federal Government and the private sector, we rehabilitated sewer systems, installed marina pump-out stations, reduced agricultural runoff and acquired sensitive land for open space conservation. 
   A lot of progress has been made towards restoring the health of the Greenwich Bay, but considerable work remains to be done. The challenge of estuary restoration is even greater at the national level. With the aid of the Estuary Habitat Restoration Partnership Act, we can revive our most precious and productive estuary resources. When you consider this bill, please remember that the beginnings of the food chain that sustain life on Earth dwell in the marshes and tidal pools that we seek to protect. I hope my colleagues will support this important bill. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000327</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am pleased to be joined today by Senator SNOWE in introducing the Medicaid DSH Preservation Act of 2000. This legislation will freeze Medicaid disproportionate share hospital (DSH) reductions at Fiscal Year 2000 levels, thereby mitigating the forthcoming reductions in Fiscal Years 2001 and 2002. This bill will also provide a growth rate adjustment to help compensate for the increases in the cost of providing care to the most needy and indigent patients. 
   In addition to the Medicare payment reductions in the Balanced Budget Act of 1997 (BBA), federal payments to the Medicaid DSH program were also reduced by $10.4 billion over 5 years, with these reductions being absorbed by States and our Nation's vulnerable safety net hospitals. Medicaid DSH payments help reimburse hospitals' costs of treating Medicaid patients, particularly those with complex medical needs. These payments also make it possible for communities to care for the uninsured--a population that is projected to increase considerably during the next few years.  
   The impact of these financial pressures was not fully anticipated at the time the BBA was enacted. Other Financial pressures such as declining Medicaid enrollment have had a significant impact on these safety net hospitals, thereby adding to the rapidly rising number of Americans without health insurance. At a time when our Nation's uninsured rate continues to climb above 44 million, it makes little sense to be reducing much-needed Medicaid DSH payments to our nation's safety net hospitals. 
   Hospitals in Rhode Island will absorb $400 million in reductions as a result of changes made to the Medicare and Medicaid programs in the BBA. Ten out of fourteen hospitals in my State had operating losses in 1999. After the BBA was enacted, it was predicted that cuts in federal Medicare and Medicaid payments would cost hospitals in Rhode Island $220 million over 5 years; however, this estimate has proven to be about $180 million off the mark. Every other State is experiencing similar problems. Since the BBA was signed into law, the American Hospital Association commissioned a study by the Lewin Group, which estimated that there would be $71 billion less paid to hospitals nationwide over 5 years. The original estimate of the impact of the BBA was $18 billion. While the Balanced Budget Refinement Act of 1999 provided some relief to our Nation's financially strapped hospitals, that relief was targeted to the Medicare program. Clearly, more needs to be done to keep our vulnerable safety net hospitals from continuing on this downward spiral. 
   This legislation we are introducing today represents a commonsense compromise that will help prevent the further erosion of our Nation's safety net hospitals and the long-term viability of our country's health care system. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000323</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am pleased to be joined today by Senator HARRY REID in introducing the Breast Cancer and Environmental Research Act of 2000. This bill would establish research centers that would be the first in the nation to specifically study the environmental factors that may be related to the development of breast cancer. The lack of agreement within the scientific community and among breast cancer advocates on this question highlights the need for further study. 
   It is generally believed that the environment plays some role in the development of breast cancer, but the extent of that role is not understood. The Breast Cancer and Environmental Research Act of 2000 will enable us to conduct more conclusive and comprehensive research to determine the impact of the environment on breast cancer. Before we can find the answers, we must determine the right questions we should be asking. 
   While more research is being conducted into the relationship between breast cancer and the environment, there are still several issues that must be resolved to make this research more effective. 
   There is no known cause of breast cancer.--There is little agreement in the scientific community on how the environment affects breast cancer. While studies have been conducted on the links between environmental factors like pesticides, diet, and electromagnetic fields, no consensus has been reached. There are other factors that have not yet been studied that could provide valuable information. While there is much speculation, it is clear that the relationship between environmental exposures and breast cancer is poorly understood. 
   There are challenges in conducting environmental research.--Identifying links between environmental factors and breast cancer is difficult. Laboratory experiments and cluster analyses, such as those in Long Island, New York, cannot reveal whether an environmental exposure increases a woman's risk of breast cancer. Epidemiological studies must be designed carefully because environmental exposures are difficult to measure. 
   Coordination between the National Institutes of Health (NIH), the National Cancer Institute (NCI), and the National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences (NIEHS).--NCI and NIEHS are the two institutes in the NIH that fund most of the research related to breast cancer and the environment; however, comprehensive information specific to environmental effects on breast cancer is not currently available. 
   This legislation would establish eight Centers of Excellence to study these potential links. These ``Breast Cancer Environmental Research Centers'' would provide for multidisciplinary research among basic, clinical, epidemiological and behavioral scientists interested in establishing outstanding, state-of-the-art research programs addressing potential links between the  environment and breast cancer. The NIEHS would award grants based on a competitive 
   peer-review process. This legislation would require each Center to collaborate with community organizations in the area, including those that represent women with breast cancer. The bill would authorize $30 million for the next five years for these grants. 
   ``Genetics loads the gun, the environment pulls the trigger,'' as Ken Olden, the Director of NIEHS, frequently says. Many scientists believe that certain groups of women have genetic variations that may make them more susceptible to adverse environmental exposures. We need to step back and gather evidence before we come to conclusions--that is the purpose of this bill. People are hungry for information, and there is a lot of inconclusive data out there, some of which has no scientific merit whatsoever. We have the opportunity through this legislation to gather legitimate and comprehensive data from premier research institutions across the nation. 
   According to the American Cancer Society, each year 800 women in Rhode Island are diagnosed with breast cancer, and 200 women in my state will die of this terrible disease this year. We owe it to these women who are diagnosed with this life-threatening disease to provide them with answers for the first time. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000322</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today to express my support for H.R. 5, the Senior Citizens Freedom to Work Act. This bill will do away with the Social Security earnings test for those individuals between the ages of 65 to 69. The earnings test has proved to be a disincentive for able and healthy senior citizens to be a productive part of the workforce. On March 1, the House of Representatives approved H.R. 5 by a vote of 422-0. Moreover, the administration has expressed its support for the bill. While I believe the amendment offered by Senator KERREY had merit, attaching it to this bill would have delayed enactment of this important legislation. Therefore, it is my belief that we should pass this bill immediately and send it to the President for his approval. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000308</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, yesterday was the tenth annual National Sportsmanship Day--a day designated to promote ethics, integrity, and character in athletics. I am pleased to say that National Sportsmanship Day was a creation of Mr. Daniel E. Doyle, Jr., Executive Director of the Institute for International Sport at the University of Rhode Island. This year, over 12,000 schools in all 50 states and more than 100 countries participated in National Sportsmanship Day. This is remarkable, since ten years ago this program only existed in Rhode Island Elementary Schools! 
   Yesterday, the Institute held a day-long live internet chat room in which athletes, coaches, journalists, students, and educators engaged in discussions of sportsmanship issues, such as trash-talking, ``winning at all costs,'' professional athletes as role models, and behavior of fans. I believe that the Institute's work in addressing the issues of character and sportsmanship, and its ability to foster good dialogue among our young people is significant. 
   As part of the Day's celebration, the Institute selected Sports Ethics Fellows who have demonstrated ``highly ethical behavior in athletics and society.'' Past recipients have included: Kirby Puckett, former Minnesota Twins outfielder and 10-time All Star; Joan Benoit Samuelson, gold medalist in the first women's Olympic marathon in 1984; and Joe Paterno, longtime head football coach at Penn State University. This year, the Institute honored 10 individuals including Grant Hill, five-time All-Star with the Detroit Pistons, and former All-American at Duke; Jennifer Rizzotti, head women's basketball coach, University of Hartford, and member of the WNBA Houston Comets; Jerry Sandusky, former defensive coordinator/linebackers coach, Penn State University, PA; and Mark Newlen, former member of the University of Virginia basketball team (1973-77) and presently physical education teacher and coach at the Collegiate School, Richmond, VA. 
   This year, the Institute has found another avenue to promote understanding and good character for youngsters. A new program called ``The No Swear Zone'' has been instituted to curb the use of profanity in elementary, middle and high school sports, as well as at the college level. In order for a school's athletic team to become a member of ``The No Swear Zone,'' it must pledge to stop the use of profanity in practice and in games. 
   I am very proud that National Sportsmanship Day was initiated in Rhode Island, and I applaud the students and teachers who participated in this inspiring day. Likewise, I congratulate all of those at the University of Rhode Island's Institute for International Sport, whose hard work and dedication over the last ten years have made this program so successful. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000302</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, this week the Senate has debated legislation which is designed, in part, to encourage families to invest in tax exempt savings accounts. Funds from these ``education savings accounts'' could be used for a variety of activities related to the education of children, including for tuition and fees at private and religious schools. I opposed this bill because I do not believe that the federal government should divert funds, in this case more than 2 billion dollars, to private and parochial education. 
   Such a move would be a fundamental change in the federal role in education, a change I believe is misguided. Ninety percent of American children attend public schools. Rather than divert federal dollars to private and parochial schools, I believe the federal government has a responsibility to assist states and local school districts work to improve education for all children, especially children in poverty and children with disabilities. 
   During this debate, a variety of amendments were offered. Senator DODD proposed an amendment that would eliminate the proposed ``education saving accounts'' and target its funds to increasing federal funding for special education. I commend my Republican colleagues for increasing IDEA--Individuals with Disabilities Education Act--funding in fiscal year 2000 by 25 percent over fiscal year 1998 and 13 percent over fiscal year 1999. Nevertheless, the federal commitment to special education falls far short of what local districts need. 
   Senator ROBB offered an amendment that would have made the funds available for school construction bonds. I agree wholeheartedly with Senator ROBB about the need to assist states and local school districts as they attempt to repair, modernize, and construct school facilities. However, I believe that there is a far better way to accomplish this goal. At the end of the last session, Senator SNOWE introduced S.1992, the Building, Renovating, and Constructing Kids' Schools, BRICKS, Act. BRICKS would provide states with low interest loans to help defray the enormous costs associated with modernizing school facilities. I urge my colleagues to look closely at Senator SNOWE's excellent proposal. 
   Finally, there have been a number of worthwhile amendments designed to improve public education. Ironically, as the Senate has been debating the Affordable Education Act, the Health, Education, Labor, and Pensions Committee has been attempting to mark-up legislation to reauthorize the Elementary and Secondary Education Act. 
   I voted against many of these amendments simply because I believe they should be considered in the context of the ESEA rather than in a piecemeal fashion on a bill the President is certain to veto. 
   Improving and supporting education is the issue of greatest interest to most Americans. I look forward to working with Chairman JEFFORDS on a strong ESEA reauthorization bill. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000229</DOCNO>
<TEXT>    Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I am pleased to join Senators LUGAR, LAUTENBERG, and DURBIN today in introducing the Smoker's Right to Know and Truth in Labeling Act, which would require comprehensive and prominent labeling of cigarettes. This legislation is a commonsense and bipartisan approach to give every American a chance to make an informed decision about tobacco use. 
   According to the Centers for Disease Control, nearly one in five deaths annually are attributed to tobacco use, making it the single most preventable cause of premature death, disease and disability facing our nation. In fact, more Americans die each year from tobacco use than from AIDS, alcohol, drug abuse, car accidents, murders, suicides, and fires combined. 
   America's children are most at risk. Despite all we know about the effects of tobacco, each day, 3,000 kids become regular smokers. Of these, 1,000 will eventually die from tobacco-related illnesses. Almost 90 percent of current adult smokers began at or before age 18. 
   Rhode Island--which already has one of the highest rates of teen smoking in the nation--has recently seen another increase in teen smoking. Today, over 37 percent of Rhode Island's high school kids smoke cigarettes. Over 23,000 Rhode Island kids under age 18 will die prematurely from tobacco-related illnesses. 
   Tobacco manufacturers say that tobacco use is a matter of choice. They argue that adults, with the full knowledge of the consequences, have the right to choose to smoke. I agree. But I also believe that individuals who choose to smoke should be making informed decisions. 
   The Smoker's Right to Know and Truth in Tobacco Labelling Act would ensure that tobacco users understand the consequences of the choice they are making. With comprehensive labelling of cigarette packs, adults and especially minors, will know the dangers that cigarettes pose to their health and the health of their loved ones. 
   This legislation follows on the recent example set by Canada, which passed tough labelling guidelines that have worked as a strong disincentive to beginning this deadly habit. Under the legislation we are introducing today, there will be no mistake about the life-threatening health effects of tobacco products. 
   As the father of three young children, I have a personal stake in helping to pass legislation to ensure that our kids do not develop this deadly habit. I hope our colleagues in the Senate will join us in passing this important, common-sense legislation. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-20000202</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, clinics that provide family planning services and counseling as well as abortions are engaged in an honest, law-abiding activity. These services enable women to exercise their right to make reasoned and informed decisions about their reproductive futures. Yet, given the escalating culture of violence surrounding these clinics, abortion providers and clinic workers risk their lives coming to work each day. 
   In my own state of Rhode Island, I have heard troubling reports of clinic violence from people such as Pablo Rodriguez M.D., medical director of Planned Parenthood Rhode Island.  
   Although Congress has made strides to stem clinic violence by passing the Freedom of Access to Clinic Entrances Act (FACE), this statute has not been a panacea. While FACE empowered those victimized by clinic violence to sue, many plaintiffs found liable in civil court for clinic violence seek refuge under our nation's bankruptcy law to avoid paying the financial penalties levied against them. 
   Providing women's health services is legal; clinic violence is not. I believe we must do anything we can to discourage these horrible acts of violence. Senator SCHUMER's amendment closes a loophole that allows perpetrators of clinic violence to escape the consequences of their actions. 
   The bankruptcy code was intended to provide a fresh start for honest debtors, not those who have violated the law and endangered innocent lives. Therefore, I urge my colleagues to vote in favor of Senator SCHUMER's amendment. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-19991119</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise today to express my support for the extension of the Northeast Dairy Compact. I also wish to commend my colleagues from New England for all of their hard work on this issue. Senators JEFFORDS, SPECTER, LEAHY, and others all have worked diligently to protect the dairy farmers in our region. I thank them for their efforts. 
   As my colleagues know, the Northeast Dairy Compact was approved by Congress in 1996 as a part of the Freedom to Farm bill. It was implemented after the Secretary of Agriculture found that there was a ``compelling public interest'' for its creation. 
   A state-generated response to the decline in the New England dairy industry over the last decade, the Dairy Compact has preserved local milk supplies for the Northeast. In 1978, there were 6,439 dairy farms in New England. By 1992, the number of dairy farms fell to 3,974. During this same time, the number of dairy farms in my home state fell from 93 to 41--a 60 percent decrease. As I stand here today, there are only 30 dairy farms remaining. 93 to 30. This certainly is an alarming number. 
   Why is this alarming? Dairy farms are the essence of New England--independent and hard working--the very symbol of our region. They are not in far away rural areas such as those in other parts of the country. Most are close to fast growing areas which are ripe for development. It would be very easy for any one of our local dairy farmers to sell their land to area developers and settle for an easier lifestyle. 
   In New England, we value the contributions of our dairy farmers. As areas feel the pressure of population growth, and the resulting stress on the environment, it becomes more and more important to support dairy farming and the benefits we all reap from their existence. We do not want to see them disappear. To have them extinguished from the New England countryside would be the equivalent of the Liberty Bell leaving Pennsylvania, the Statue of Liberty leaving New York, and Mount Rushmore being torn down for townhomes in South Dakota. 
   The Northeast Dairy Compact works. It is only fitting that we are here today to extend its existence. To do otherwise would jeopardize the progress that has been made to preserve our lands and the farming economy in New England. 
   Again, I thank my colleagues for their attention, and I yield the floor. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-19991119</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, although I have only recently joined the Senate and did not have the privilege of working on this bill, I am honored to rise as a cosponsor of the John H. Chafee Foster Care Independence Act of 1999. I cannot think of a more fitting tribute to the memory of my late father than approving this legislation renamed in his honor. 
   I thank the leadership for bringing this bill to the floor so soon after my father's passing. And I would also like to acknowledge the hard work of the others who led the effort: Senators ROCKEFELLER, COLLINS, SNOWE, JEFFORDS, MOYNIHAN, BOND, and others. Along with my father, your efforts will provide assistance to one of our nation's most vulnerable groups: older children in the foster care program. 
   Currently, Independent Living Programs for older foster children end at their 18th birthday, abandoning these teens in the middle of a critical transition period from adolescence to adulthood. Sadly, these young people are left to negotiate the rough waters of adulthood without vital health and mental health resources and critical life-skills. 
   However, this legislation will cushion a usually abrupt transition by funding Independent Living Programs for foster children through their 21st birthday. It also provides states the option to extend health and mental health care benefits to these youngsters until age 21 under the Medicaid Program and specifies a minimum grant of $500,000 for smaller states like Rhode Island to provide such benefits. 
   Before he died, my father learned first-hand of the need for this legislation when several older foster care children who had ``aged-out'' of the system testified before his Finance Subcommittee. These youngsters told moving stories; sleeping outdoors, eating out of dumpsters, and accepting the charity of their teachers to pay for medical bills became their harsh reality because they were too old to remain in an Independent Living Program or a foster family. As a result, many of his Senate colleagues and First Lady Hillary Clinton cheered him on in his efforts to enact this legislation. 
   Indeed, ensuring that the most vulnerable members of our society retained basic human dignity guided my father's actions during his years of public service. Bipartisanship was also a watchword he live by. This bill encompasses both of these noble qualities and I know he would be honored by the passage of this legislation today. I urge my colleagues to join me in supporting this important measure. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-19991117</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, on rollcall No. 367, I voted ``aye.'' It was my intention to vote ``no.'' Therefore, I ask unanimous consent that I be permitted to change my vote. It would in no way change the outcome of the vote. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-19991110</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, one of my constituents, Mrs. Virginia Doris of Warwick, Rhode Island, recently sent my late father a poem she had written as a tribute to the veterans of World War II. I understand that he agreed to insert her poem in the CONGRESSIONAL RECORD in time for Veterans Day. I was honored when Mrs. Doris asked me to carry out that task in his place. 
   Before I do so, I would like to take a brief moment to alert my colleagues to Mrs. Doris's own contribution to the war effort. 
   During World War II, 23,000 Oerlikon-Gazda 20mm anti-aircraft guns were manufactured in my home state of Rhode Island. Originally produced in Switzerland, these guns were critical to the Allied campaign--nearly every ship in the fleet carried them by the end of the war. 
   And Virginia Doris was right in the thick of this arms production effort, working long hours in the drafting room of the Oerlikon-Gazda command center, located in downtown Providence. In a 1990 interview with the Providence-Journal, Mrs. Doris described her years at the center ``as this marvelous period in my life.'' Equipped with what she refers to as her ``turbo persona,'' Mrs. Doris was a valued and trusted member of the Oerlikon-Gazda team. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-19991109</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I ask unanimous consent to speak as in morning business for up to 10 minutes. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-2-19991109</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. I thank the Chair. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-19991109</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, I rise to clarify my two votes today on amendments to the bankruptcy reform legislation to increase the minimum wage by $1.00, from $5.15 to $6.15 per hour. Let me begin by saying that I preferred the approach taken by Senator KENNEDY's amendment to increase the minimum wage in two increments over the next fourteen months.  
   As my colleagues are aware, an increase in the minimum wage is needed for our Nation's workers. At our current minimum wage of $5.15 per hour, many of our workers are unable to support themselves and their families. In response to this need, I voted against a motion to table the Kennedy amendment because I believe workers should receive the increase over fourteen months, as opposed to the twenty-nine months proposed in the Domenici amendment. I also preferred the Kennedy approach because the business tax incentives offered in the amendment were fully paid for. On the other hand, the Domenici amendment provided $75 billion in business tax incentives to be funded by projected budget surpluses which may, or may not, materialize. Nevertheless, to its credit, the Domenici amendment offered provisions related to health insurance deductibility, and the permanent extension of the Work Opportunity Tax Credit--two important legislative items. 
   It is no secret that our economy is strong. Inflation is low and the economic arguments against raising the minimum wage are attempts not particularly persuasive. In fact, a recent editorial in the Providence Journal stated that ``..... higher wages often mean greater loyalty and effort on the part of employees. Thus, whatever the increment of a higher minimum wage, that cost could be more than offset by higher revenue and profits from increased productivity and reduced turnover, hiring, and training costs. ..... Congress ought to do it.'' 
   However, when the Kennedy amendment was tabled, I thought it was important to have, at the very least, some version of a minimum wage package approved by the Senate. Thus, I then voted in favor of the Domenici amendment. Although it is not an ideal package, I am hopeful that an agreement can be reached on a sensible, bipartisan approach to raising the minimum wage once the House passes its own version of the legislation. I urge my colleagues find that common ground, which in the end, will help our economy and our working families. We ought to do it. </TEXT></DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO>106-chafee-ri-1-19991109</DOCNO>
<TEXT>   Mr. L. CHAFEE. Mr. President, today I have the enormous honor of introducing legislation to renew and strengthen the Even Start Family Literacy Act. On October 1, 1985, my father stood at this desk, where I stand today, and introduced the Even Start Act. He did so because of his profound commitment to the most vulnerable and disadvantaged members of our society. As I introduce this bill, which attempts to break the cycle of illiteracy that divides our Nation into haves and have nots, I do so in an effort to continue that commitment to disadvantaged Americans.  
   Last week, an identical bill was introduced in the House of Representatives by BILL GOODLING, chairman of the House Committee on Education and the Workforce. Chairman GOODLING introduced the original Even Start Act in the House on May 16, 1985. Both versions of the Even Start Act were reintroduced in the 100th Congress and became law as part of the Hawkins-Stafford Elementary and Secondary Improvement Act Amendments of 1987. 
   There are approximately 40 million Americans who suffer from illiteracy. Like a disease, illiteracy often goes undetected. Like a disease, illiteracy too often is passed from generation to generation. Like a disease, illiteracy is painful for families to endure. There is no certain cure for illiteracy, but by renewing and expanding the Even Start Family Literacy Program, we offer tens of thousands of families hope for a better future. 
   There are many controversies related to education policy at the local, state and federal levels. There are heartfelt, passionately held opinions about everything from funding levels to particular teaching techniques. Nevertheless, there are a few things on which nearly everyone agrees: parents are their children's first and most important teachers, and children who are read to early and often do better in school than children who are not. 
   As the father of three young children, reading together is a part of daily life that I take for granted. I suspect that it is difficult for most of the members of this body to imagine what it would be like not to have the ability to sit down with your children or grandchildren to read a favorite story. But for millions of Americans, reading a bedtime story or helping with a son or daughter's homework assignment is impossible. 
   The Even Start Family Literacy Act brings families together to learn. Parents who do not have a high school degree or its equivalent are eligible for this program. They learn the basic educational skills that enable them to improve their own situations and, perhaps even more importantly, they 
   learn the skills they need to help their children in school. At the same time, children from birth to age 8 receive appropriate educational services. 
   The bill I am introducing makes two notable changes in the Even Start program. First, it enables a child, who also is receiving title I services, to remain in the Even Start program beyond age 8. It also requires Even Start programs to utilize research-based teaching techniques for children. In addition to these improvements, it authorizes the Institute for Literacy to investigate the most effective means of improving adults' literacy skills, and it increases the authorization level to $500 million so that more families can be served. 
   Currently, there are four Even Start programs in Rhode Island receiving federal funds. Each of these programs serves between 25 and 40 families. In Newport, the Sullivan School Children's Opportunity Zone/Family Center has entered into an Even Start partnership with New Visions--the local Head Start provider, the Newport Public Library, the Florence Gray Center--which provides housing for low-income families, the Community College of Rhode Island and the Newport Hospital. Half of its participants are non-English readers. 
   In Woonsocket, the Fairmont School is the Even Start center, with partners from Literacy Volunteers of Northern Rhode Island and Woonsocket Head Start, among others. Three cities and towns--Johnston, North Providence, and Smithfield, have joined together to create the Tri-Town Community Action Even Start Program. Finally, the Cunningham School Even Start Program has established a partnership with Pawtucket Public Schools and Libraries, the Pawtucket Day Nursery, and a range of education and social service providers. 
   Each of these programs has utilized existing early childhood and adult education services. Together they are striving to address the needs of the whole family. 
   In the 12 years since the Even Start Program first was created, our nation has been propelled into the information age. Americans are increasingly dependent on technology for a wide range of needs and services. This new age magnifies our need for a literate society. As we continue to experience technological advancements, the educationally disadvantaged fall further behind. I believe that the Even Start Family Literacy Act as reauthorized by this bill--the Literacy Involves Families Together Act--is critically important to our Nation's children, our Nation's families, and our Nation's future. 
   I see Senator JEFFORDS on the floor. Before I yield to him, I thank him for his generosity to me and for his leadership in the area of education. Chairman JEFFORDS has the daunting task of leading the Senate's efforts to reauthorize the Elementary and Secondary Education Act. From what I know of Senator JEFFORDS, this major undertaking couldn't be in more able hands. 
   Mr. President, I urge my colleagues to join me as cosponsors of this bill. </TEXT></DOC>

